A-Kid
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card with potential for upper card slots.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Golden Ratio Kick, Omoplata, Moonsault Press.
Brief description: A-Kid debuted in PWG during the 2019 Battle of Los Angeles (BOLA), where he showcased his technical prowess and aerial agility. Although his PWG appearances were limited, his bouts, especially in the high-stakes tournament format, highlighted his versatility and potential as a breakout star in the independent scene.

ACH
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular competitor from 2013 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and occasional main event.
Wrestling style: Athletic, high-energy high flyer with strong striking elements.
Signature moves: Midnight Star (450 Splash), Dragon Suplex, Air Jordan Dive.
Brief description: ACH was a fan favorite in PWG, known for his electrifying charisma and incredible athleticism. Notable matches include his performances in the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and tag team bouts. His high-octane style and ability to connect with the crowd made him a staple of PWG's dynamic cards during his tenure.

Adam Brooks
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances, primarily in 2017 and 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical and high-flying styles.
Signature moves: Swanton Bomb, Brainbuster, Double Stomp.
Brief description: Representing Australia, Adam Brooks made a mark in PWG with his fiery energy and innovative offense. His matches, including those in BOLA 2018, demonstrated his capacity to keep up with PWG’s elite roster, earning him recognition as a rising talent in the global independent wrestling scene.

Adam Cole
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2011 to 2017.
Position on the card: Main eventer and PWG World Champion.
Wrestling style: Opportunistic technician with a flair for showmanship.
Signature moves: Panama Sunrise, Florida Key, Last Shot.
Brief description: Adam Cole cemented his legacy in PWG as one of its most successful stars. Winning the PWG World Championship and delivering show-stealing matches against the likes of Kyle O'Reilly and The Young Bucks, Cole’s time in PWG showcased his skill as both a wrestler and a captivating heel. His mic work and in-ring storytelling added significant depth to PWG’s roster during his reign.

Adam Pearce
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and occasional main event.
Wrestling style: Traditional brawler with a strong focus on psychology.
Signature moves: Jumping Piledriver, Figure Four Leglock, Top Rope Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A key figure in PWG’s early days, Adam Pearce brought old-school grit and storytelling to the promotion. His feuds with Colt Cabana and matches in the tag team division contributed to establishing PWG’s reputation as a haven for diverse wrestling styles.

Adam Thornstowe
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Limited appearances, notably in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with high-risk tendencies.
Signature moves: Scum Stomp, Cutthroat Driver, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Known primarily for his work in the tag team scene as part of Reno Scum, Thornstowe brought his rough-and-tumble style to PWG, complementing the promotion’s variety. His sporadic appearances still made an impact, particularly in tag matches highlighting his intensity.

Addiction (Christopher Daniels & Frankie Kazarian)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic tag team appearances from 2014 to 2017.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Balanced tag team, mixing high-flying and technical prowess.
Signature moves: Celebrity Rehab, BME (Best Moonsault Ever), Wave of the Future.
Brief description: As The Addiction, Daniels and Kazarian brought their experience and chemistry to PWG’s acclaimed tag team division. Their matches with The Young Bucks and other prominent teams elevated the division and added star power to PWG events.

Aerial Express (Scorpio Sky & Quicksilver)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Fast-paced high flyers with tag team synergy.
Signature moves: Overhead Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Top Rope Hurricanrana, Tandem Springboard Moves.
Brief description: A cornerstone of PWG’s early tag team scene, Aerial Express dazzled fans with their innovative offense and seamless teamwork. Their rivalry with other early tag teams helped lay the groundwork for PWG’s celebrated tag division.

Aero Star
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high flyer.
Signature moves: Imploding 450 Splash, Springboard Tornillo, Suicide Dive Headbutt.
Brief description: As a standout in the lucha libre scene, Aero Star brought his aerial acrobatics to PWG. His spectacular high-flying matches added variety to PWG cards, and his unique move set left an impression during his appearances.

Age of the Fall (Jimmy Jacobs & Tyler Black)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances between 2008 and 2010.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Psychological brawling and high-impact tag team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Contra Code, God’s Last Gift, Doomsday Rana.
Brief description: Age of the Fall brought their ominous and rebellious faction ethos to PWG, delivering intense matches with teams like The Young Bucks. Their PWG tenure showcased their ability to blend storytelling with innovative in-ring work, earning acclaim during their run.

AJ Styles
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2004 to 2007, with a brief return in 2014.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: High-flying hybrid of technical and power-based offense.
Signature moves: Styles Clash, Phenomenal Forearm, Spiral Tap.
Brief description: AJ Styles was one of the biggest stars to grace PWG’s early days. Known for his innovative offense and global reputation, he faced top-tier talent and elevated the quality of PWG cards. His later return in 2014 brought immense star power, culminating in standout performances against PWG’s new generation.

Akira Tozawa
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular competitor from 2010 to 2014.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-energy striker with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Deadlift German Suplex, Snap Senton, Shining Wizard.
Brief description: Akira Tozawa became a fan favorite in PWG, blending hard-hitting offense with comedic timing. His feuds and partnerships, including matches with Kevin Steen and The Young Bucks, showcased his versatility and charisma in PWG’s dynamic environment.

Al Katrazz
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card to enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse brawler.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Big Boot.
Brief description: As one of PWG’s early roster members, Al Katrazz contributed to building the promotion’s foundation. While primarily used as enhancement talent, his imposing physique and powerful style added variety to PWG’s early cards.

Alex Koslov
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2008 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha-inspired high-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Red Scare (Tornado DDT), Shooting Star Press, Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: A talented performer, Alex Koslov brought his lucha libre background to PWG, delivering exciting matches and unique character work. His blend of athleticism and submission-based offense added depth to PWG’s mid-card bouts.

Alex Shelley
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular appearances from 2004 to 2006, with a return in 2014.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical innovator with a hybrid of submission and striking.
Signature moves: Shellshock, Border City Stretch, Automatic Midnight.
Brief description: Alex Shelley’s PWG tenure featured his blend of technical mastery and innovation. A standout in both singles and tag team competition, he delivered memorable matches with talent like Kevin Steen and Chris Sabin. Shelley’s versatility and experience made him a valuable addition to PWG’s cards during his time with the promotion.

Alex Zayne
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances, notably in 2021 and 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-risk, aerial innovator.
Signature moves: Cinnamon Twist, Baja Blast, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: A high-flying sensation, Alex Zayne brought his death-defying moves and unconventional charisma to PWG. His matches showcased his creativity and adaptability, making him a standout in PWG’s contemporary landscape.

Amazing Red
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2004 and 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying innovator with a focus on speed and agility.
Signature moves: InfraRed, Red Star Press, Code Red.
Brief description: Amazing Red’s pioneering high-flying style made him a standout during his limited PWG appearances. His matches brought a unique flair to the cards, showcasing his groundbreaking aerial maneuvers that influenced a generation of independent wrestlers.

American Dragon (Bryan Danielson)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2009.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based grappler.
Signature moves: Cattle Mutilation, Dragon Suplex, Elbow Strikes.
Brief description: As one of the most celebrated technical wrestlers, American Dragon played a significant role in establishing PWG as a home for world-class talent. His matches against the likes of Chris Hero and Samoa Joe were widely acclaimed, and his ability to seamlessly transition between technical dominance and hard-hitting strikes cemented his legacy in PWG history.

American Wolves (Davey Richards & Eddie Edwards)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2008 to 2010.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Powerbomb/Lungblower Combo, Alarm Clock, Backpack Stunner.
Brief description: The American Wolves brought their intense, technical style to PWG’s tag team division, engaging in standout matches with teams like The Young Bucks. Their ability to blend aggression with precision made them a highlight of PWG’s evolving tag team scene.

Andrew Everett
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Aerial high flyer with incredible agility.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, 630 Senton, Springboard Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Known for his jaw-dropping acrobatics, Andrew Everett became a fan favorite in PWG. His matches, often filled with death-defying spots, contributed to the fast-paced, high-energy reputation of PWG events. Everett's participation in multi-man matches and Battle of Los Angeles tournaments further showcased his talents.

Angelico
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hybrid lucha libre with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Fall of the Angels, Navarro Death Roll, Diving Double Stomp.
Brief description: Angelico’s flair and unorthodox style brought a unique flavor to PWG. His ability to mix lucha libre-inspired moves with striking and submission elements made his appearances memorable, particularly in tag team matches and multi-man showcases.

Angelo Parker
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances, notably in 2018.
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Grounded, technical brawler with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Parkerplex, Neckbreaker, Leaping DDT.
Brief description: Angelo Parker, known for his dynamic personality, made brief appearances in PWG as part of undercard matches. His charisma and ability to connect with the audience added entertainment value to PWG’s diverse lineup.

Anthony Henry
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2021 and 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting technical striker with submission elements.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Diving Double Stomp, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Anthony Henry’s PWG tenure showcased his gritty, aggressive style, often in singles competition. His ability to blend striking with technical groundwork made him a solid addition to the promotion’s contemporary roster.

AR Fox
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular competitor from 2013 to 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying, risk-taking aerialist.
Signature moves: Lo Mein Pain, 450 Splash, Springboard Spanish Fly.
Brief description: AR Fox became a highlight reel in PWG, delivering high-octane performances in multi-man matches and singles bouts. Known for his innovative offense and fearless approach, he left a lasting impression in tournaments like the Battle of Los Angeles.

Aramis
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular appearances beginning in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high flyer with technical submissions.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Reverse Hurricanrana, Tornillo Plancha.
Brief description: Aramis brought his authentic lucha libre style to PWG, engaging in thrilling matches with top talent. His agility and fluid movement in the ring have solidified his role as a standout performer in PWG’s contemporary era.

Arez
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre innovator with unorthodox offense.
Signature moves: Diving Moonsault, Rolling Crucifix Bomb, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Arez’s unique approach to lucha libre and unconventional move set added a distinct flavor to PWG. His dynamic and unpredictable style quickly earned him recognition in PWG’s high-energy cards.

Arik Cannon
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2004 to 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Glimmering Warlock, Total Anarchy, Exploder Suplex.
Brief description: A staple of the independent wrestling scene, Arik Cannon brought his aggressive, no-nonsense style to PWG. His matches showcased his versatility, whether in singles or tag team bouts, during the promotion’s formative years.

Appetite for Destruction (Kevin Steen & Super Dragon)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2011 to 2013.
Position on the card: Main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Brutal and aggressive power-based tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver/Double Stomp Combo, Psycho Driver, Senton Bomb.
Brief description: Appetite for Destruction dominated PWG’s tag team division, holding the PWG World Tag Team Championship and engaging in brutal, high-profile matches with teams like The Young Bucks. Their combination of brute strength and ruthless tactics made them a feared force in the division.

Arrogance (Chris Bosh & Scott Lost)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying tag team with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Bosh Bomb, Superman Spear, Snapshot.
Brief description: Arrogance was a cornerstone of PWG’s early tag team division. Their mix of humor, athleticism, and strong in-ring psychology earned them multiple PWG World Tag Team Championships. Their feuds with teams like Super Dragon and Excalibur helped elevate the prominence of tag team wrestling in PWG.

Artemis Spencer
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2019 and 2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High flyer with a technical edge.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Moonsault, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Representing the Canadian wrestling scene, Artemis Spencer brought his athletic and versatile style to PWG. His performances in multi-man matches demonstrated his ability to shine against top-tier independent talent.

Aussie Open (Mark Davis & Kyle Fletcher)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular appearances starting in 2022.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and high-flying tag team.
Signature moves: Coriolis, Dental Plan, Assisted Cutter.
Brief description: Aussie Open has quickly risen to prominence in PWG’s tag team scene, delivering hard-hitting and high-energy performances. Their matches against teams like The Young Bucks and The Rascalz have positioned them as one of the premier tag teams in PWG.

Austin Aries
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2004 to 2007.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Last Chancery, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Austin Aries brought his mix of technical prowess and intensity to PWG, delivering standout performances in both singles and tag team matches. His bouts during the mid-2000s helped solidify PWG as a home for elite independent talent.

B-Boy
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2006, with sporadic returns later.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with strong technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Cross Special Brainbuster, Drop Dead Driver.
Brief description: A stalwart of PWG’s early years, B-Boy played a pivotal role in shaping the promotion’s hard-hitting style. His intense rivalries with wrestlers like Samoa Joe and Super Dragon are among PWG’s most memorable moments, earning him a reputation as a cornerstone of the promotion’s early success.

Babi Slymm
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with charismatic flair.
Signature moves: Running Powerslam, Big Splash, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Babi Slymm added a unique dynamic to PWG’s early roster with his larger-than-life persona and power-focused wrestling. While primarily a mid-card competitor, his presence added variety to PWG’s formative years.

Ballard Brothers (Shane & Shannon Ballard)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Classic tag team wrestling with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Double Flapjack, Diving Elbow Drop, Double Spinebuster.
Brief description: As one of PWG’s early tag teams, the Ballard Brothers contributed to the promotion’s burgeoning tag division. Known for their cohesive teamwork and veteran presence, they helped establish PWG’s reputation for diverse styles in its early days.

Bandido
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2018 to present.
Position on the card: Main eventer and PWG World Champion.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with strong technical elements.
Signature moves: 21 Plex, Fosbury Flop, Moonsault Slam.
Brief description: Bandido has become one of PWG’s standout performers, delivering exceptional matches and winning the PWG World Championship. His combination of breathtaking agility and technical skill has made him a fan favorite and a cornerstone of PWG’s modern era.

Best Friends (Chuck Taylor & Trent Beretta)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2013 to 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Mix of comedic timing and technical tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Strong Zero, Sole Food/Half-and-Half Suplex Combo, Crunchy.
Brief description: Best Friends became a fan-favorite tag team in PWG, combining their humor with serious wrestling ability. Their chemistry and crowd engagement made them one of the most entertaining duos in PWG’s tag division, with several standout matches against The Young Bucks and other top teams.

Biff Busick
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2014 to 2016.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting striker with technical grappling.
Signature moves: Half-and-Half Suplex, Blockbuster, Rear Naked Choke.
Brief description: Biff Busick’s intensity and gritty style made him a standout in PWG during his tenure. His matches in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and singles bouts showcased his ability to deliver hard-hitting, crowd-pleasing performances.

Bino Gambino
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Grounded, technical brawler.
Signature moves: Gambino Bomb, DDT, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Bino Gambino was a consistent performer in PWG during its early years, contributing to the promotion’s growing roster depth. Known for his solid in-ring style, he participated in various singles and tag team matches, adding variety to PWG cards.

BJ Whitmer
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005 and 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Lariat, Wrist-Clutch Exploder.
Brief description: BJ Whitmer’s time in PWG highlighted his physical style and ability to engage in intense matches. While his PWG appearances were limited, his work contributed to the promotion’s reputation for showcasing a wide range of wrestling styles.

Black Taurus
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular appearances starting in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based lucha libre with agile maneuvers.
Signature moves: Taurus Driver, Diving Headbutt, Spinning Powerslam.
Brief description: Black Taurus brought a unique blend of power and agility to PWG, quickly becoming a standout performer. His matches have been praised for their intensity and innovation, particularly in multi-man and singles bouts against high-profile opponents.

Blake Christian
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2021 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with strong striking elements.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Golden Trident, Springboard 450 Cutter.
Brief description: Blake Christian’s dynamic and athletic style has made him a standout in PWG’s contemporary era. His ability to deliver thrilling matches with innovative offense has earned him recognition among fans and peers alike.

Bobby Fish
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2011 to 2014.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission specialist with MMA influence.
Signature moves: Fish Hook Deluxe Edition, Falcon Arrow, Exploder Suplex.
Brief description: Bobby Fish’s technical and strike-heavy style added a distinct flavor to PWG’s mid-card scene. His matches often showcased his versatility, both in singles competition and as part of tag team bouts.

Bobby Quance
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2004.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Tornado DDT, Tiger Suplex.
Brief description: As a key performer in PWG’s early years, Bobby Quance delivered exciting, fast-paced matches that showcased his aerial expertise. His contributions helped establish PWG as a promotion where diverse wrestling styles could thrive.

Brad Bradley
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Black Hole Slam, Powerbomb, Big Boot.
Brief description: Brad Bradley’s brief PWG tenure showcased his physicality and hard-hitting style. While primarily used in mid-card matches, his presence added variety to PWG’s cards during his appearances.

Brandon Bonham
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2009.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Shooting Star Press, Springboard Dropkick.
Brief description: Brandon Bonham made an impact during his time in PWG with his athletic and fast-paced style. His performances in multi-man matches and singles bouts reflected his potential as a rising star in the independent wrestling scene.

Brandon Cutler
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2014.
Position on the card: Mid-card to tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Cutler Driver, Springboard Moonsault, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Brandon Cutler, often teaming with his brother Dustin, contributed to PWG’s tag team division. Known for his unique blend of athleticism and humor, he was a regular part of the promotion’s entertaining undercard and tag team matches.

Brandon Gatson
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2011.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Agile high-flyer with technical elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Spiral Tap, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Brandon Gatson delivered several memorable matches in PWG, often competing in multi-man showcases and tournament matches. His innovative offense and crowd-pleasing style made him a standout during his time in the promotion.

Brandon Thomaselli
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2004 and 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with strong striking elements.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Superkick, Springboard Leg Drop.
Brief description: Thomaselli’s PWG matches highlighted his athleticism and versatility. His ability to combine aerial maneuvers with striking offense contributed to the variety of PWG’s mid-2000s cards.

Brian Cage
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2010 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with high-flying agility.
Signature moves: Drill Claw, Weapon X, F-5.
Brief description: Brian Cage’s impressive mix of power and athleticism made him a standout in PWG. He participated in high-profile matches and tournaments, including the Battle of Los Angeles, and became one of the promotion’s top stars during his tenure.

Brian Kendrick
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2006 to 2008, with sporadic returns later.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid with unorthodox offense.
Signature moves: Sliced Bread #2, Tornado DDT, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Brian Kendrick’s time in PWG showcased his ability to mix technical skill with a unique in-ring style. His matches, often against top independent talent, demonstrated his creativity and adaptability in various scenarios.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers and teams with documented contributions to Pro Wrestling Guerrilla (PWG). Wrestlers without verified appearances are excluded.

Briscoe Brothers (Jay & Mark Briscoe)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2007 to 2013.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawling with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Doomsday Device, Jay Driller, Froggy Bow.
Brief description: The Briscoe Brothers brought their intense and chaotic style to PWG, engaging in thrilling tag team matches against teams like The Young Bucks. Their performances were a perfect fit for PWG’s high-energy atmosphere, and they left a lasting impression on the promotion’s tag team division.

Brody King
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2018 to 2022.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Gonzo Bomb, All-Seeing Eye, Blackout.
Brief description: Brody King became a dominant force in PWG, known for his explosive power and commanding presence. He won the PWG World Championship and participated in some of the promotion’s most memorable matches in recent years, cementing himself as a top-tier talent.

Bryan Danielson (American Dragon)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2009.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based grappler.
Signature moves: Cattle Mutilation, Dragon Suplex, Elbow Strikes.
Brief description: Bryan Danielson was one of PWG’s most accomplished and celebrated wrestlers, delivering clinic-level performances against a variety of opponents. His mastery of technical wrestling, combined with his storytelling ability, made him a cornerstone of PWG during his tenure.

Buddy Matthews
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Striking and high-impact hybrid.
Signature moves: Murphy’s Law, Meteora, Curb Stomp.
Brief description: Buddy Matthews quickly made an impact in PWG with his dynamic in-ring style and physical intensity. His matches have showcased his ability to deliver main-event-level performances, earning him a spot among PWG’s top competitors.

BxB Hulk
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2008.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking hybrid.
Signature moves: First Flash, Phoenix Splash, EVO.
Brief description: A standout from the Japanese promotion Dragon Gate, BxB Hulk brought his explosive and energetic style to PWG. His brief stint featured thrilling matches that showcased his agility and charisma.

Caleb Konley
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2012 to 2014.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: O-Face, Moonsault, Sitout Facebuster.
Brief description: Caleb Konley contributed solid performances to PWG during his appearances, often in multi-man matches. His versatile wrestling style made him a reliable performer on PWG cards.

Candice LeRae
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2006 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, and a tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Resilient high flyer with technical elements.
Signature moves: Ballplex, Moonsault, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Candice LeRae was a trailblazer in PWG, becoming one of the most beloved performers in the promotion’s history. Her partnership with Joey Ryan as “The World’s Cutest Tag Team” led to memorable matches, including a bloody and iconic Guerrilla Warfare bout against The Young Bucks. Her resilience and charisma made her a standout in both singles and tag team action.

Candice LeRae
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2006 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, and a tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Resilient high flyer with technical elements.
Signature moves: Ballplex, Moonsault, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Candice LeRae was a trailblazer in PWG, becoming one of the most beloved performers in the promotion’s history. Her partnership with Joey Ryan as “The World’s Cutest Tag Team” led to memorable matches, including a bloody and iconic Guerrilla Warfare bout against The Young Bucks. Her resilience and charisma made her a standout in both singles and tag team action.

Cape Fear (El Generico & Quicksilver)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2007.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Springboard Tornado DDT, Half-and-Half Suplex, Tandem Dropkick.
Brief description: Cape Fear was a dynamic tag team in PWG’s early years. Their chemistry and innovative offense made them one of the most exciting duos in the tag division. They competed in high-profile matches and helped elevate the tag team scene.

Caveman Ugg
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances beginning in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Ugg Driver, Falling Headbutt, Gorilla Press Slam.
Brief description: Caveman Ugg brought his unique, prehistoric-themed character and powerful wrestling style to PWG. His blend of humor and physical dominance made him a standout in multi-man matches and added variety to the promotion’s cards.

Cedric Alexander
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2014 to 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with strong striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Lumbar Check, Springboard Clothesline, Brainbuster.
Brief description: Cedric Alexander impressed PWG audiences with his explosive offense and incredible athleticism. His performances in the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and singles matches helped solidify his reputation as one of the best in the independent wrestling scene during his tenure.

Charles Mercury
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Grounded technical wrestling with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: STF, Swinging Neckbreaker, Double Arm DDT.
Brief description: As part of PWG’s early roster, Charles Mercury was a dependable performer who contributed to the promotion’s foundation. His technical style and heel persona made him a versatile competitor in singles and tag team action.

Chosen Bros (Matt Riddle & Jeff Cobb)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2018.
Position on the card: Main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse duo with suplexes and submissions.
Signature moves: Assisted German Suplex, Bromission, Tour of the Islands.
Brief description: Chosen Bros were a dominant force in PWG’s tag team division, winning the PWG World Tag Team Championship. Their combination of brute strength and technical finesse made them a formidable team, with standout matches against The Young Bucks and other top teams.

Chris Bosh
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Bosh Bomb, Vertical Suplex Piledriver, Superman Spear.
Brief description: A key figure in PWG’s early years, Chris Bosh was known for his charisma, in-ring skill, and comedic timing. As part of the faction Arrogance and a multiple-time PWG World Tag Team Champion, Bosh left an indelible mark on the promotion’s history.

Chris Dickinson
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular starting in 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting striker with submission elements.
Signature moves: Pazuzu Bomb, Brainbuster, STF.
Brief description: Chris Dickinson brought his aggressive, no-nonsense style to PWG, becoming a standout in the promotion’s contemporary era. His physical intensity and ability to deliver in high-profile matches made him a key player in PWG’s roster.

Chris Hero
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2017.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting striker with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Rolling Elbow, Hero’s Welcome, Cyclone Kill.
Brief description: Chris Hero was a cornerstone of PWG for over a decade, delivering classic matches against the likes of Bryan Danielson and The Young Bucks. His versatility and charisma made him one of PWG’s most celebrated stars, contributing significantly to its rise in prominence.

Chris Sabin
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2008, with sporadic appearances later.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Cradle Shock, Hail Sabin, Superkick.
Brief description: Chris Sabin’s appearances in PWG highlighted his blend of speed, agility, and technical expertise. As a key player in the independent wrestling scene, his matches, including tag bouts alongside Alex Shelley, were standout moments in PWG’s early years.

Christina Von Eerie
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2010 and 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Punk-inspired brawler with lucha libre elements.
Signature moves: Graveyard Smash, Headscissors Takedown, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Christina Von Eerie brought her distinctive punk aesthetic and unique wrestling style to PWG. Her performances in singles and mixed-tag matches showcased her versatility and added diversity to the promotion’s roster.

Christopher Daniels
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2017.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid with excellent psychology.
Signature moves: Angel’s Wings, Best Moonsault Ever, Uranage Slam.
Brief description: Christopher Daniels was a pivotal figure in PWG’s development, consistently delivering high-quality matches. A multiple-time PWG World Tag Team Champion as part of The Addiction, Daniels’s experience and charisma solidified his legacy in the promotion.

Chuck Taylor
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Comedic grappler with high-flying and technical skills.
Signature moves: Awful Waffle, Sole Food, Omega Driver.
Brief description: Chuck Taylor became one of PWG’s most beloved performers, blending comedy with exceptional in-ring ability. As part of Best Friends and in singles competition, Taylor was a staple of PWG cards for over a decade.

CIMA
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical innovator.
Signature moves: Meteora, Schwein, Iconoclasm.
Brief description: As one of Dragon Gate’s top stars, CIMA brought his innovative style to PWG, competing in thrilling matches that highlighted his versatility and influence on modern wrestling. His appearances added an international flair to PWG’s events.

Claudio Castagnoli (Cesaro)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2011.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based technical grappler.
Signature moves: Neutralizer, Ricola Bomb, Swiss Death Uppercut.
Brief description: Claudio Castagnoli was a dominant presence in PWG, known for his incredible strength and technical skill. As a tag team specialist with Chris Hero in the Kings of Wrestling and as a singles competitor, he consistently delivered high-caliber performances and helped elevate PWG’s reputation globally.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers and teams with documented contributions to Pro Wrestling Guerrilla (PWG). Wrestlers without verified appearances are excluded.

Cole Steen Cole (Adam Cole & Kevin Steen)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2012.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Power and technical hybrid with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver/Superkick Combo, Brainbuster, Crossface.
Brief description: A short-lived but memorable pairing, Cole Steen Cole blended Adam Cole's charisma and Kevin Steen's intensity, delivering entertaining matches that showcased their chemistry and humor. Their team added variety to PWG’s tag division during their run.

Colt Cabana
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2009, with sporadic returns later.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic hybrid.
Signature moves: Colt 45, Flying Apple, Billy Goat’s Curse.
Brief description: Known for his mix of humor and technical prowess, Colt Cabana was a fan favorite in PWG. His matches often featured a unique blend of lighthearted antics and skillful grappling, solidifying his role as a versatile performer in the promotion.

Cutler Brothers (Brandon & Dustin Cutler)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Cutler Driver, Tandem Springboard DDT, Assisted Moonsault.
Brief description: The Cutler Brothers brought their cohesive teamwork and aerial offense to PWG, contributing to the tag team division’s depth. They competed against top teams like The Young Bucks, adding excitement to the promotion’s mid-card.

Daisuke Sekimoto
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2012.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting powerhouse with technical elements.
Signature moves: Deadlift German Suplex, Argentine Backbreaker, Lariat.
Brief description: Daisuke Sekimoto showcased his incredible strength and intense style during his PWG appearances. His matches were a showcase of Japanese strong style, making a lasting impression on PWG audiences and adding an international flair to the promotion.

Dalton Castle
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2015 to 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Charismatic grappler with technical and suplex-based offense.
Signature moves: Bang-A-Rang, Deadlift German Suplex, Standing Dropkick.
Brief description: Dalton Castle’s flamboyant character and in-ring ability brought a unique flavor to PWG. His blend of showmanship and athleticism made his appearances memorable, particularly in multi-man matches where his charisma shined.

Daniel Garcia
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking elements.
Signature moves: Dragon Slayer, Sharpshooter, Hammerlock Suplex.
Brief description: Daniel Garcia has become a prominent figure in PWG, showcasing his technical wrestling prowess and methodical approach in matches against top-tier opponents. His in-ring psychology and intensity have made him a standout in PWG’s contemporary roster.

Darby Allin
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Risk-taking high-flyer with a focus on speed and resilience.
Signature moves: Coffin Drop, Springboard Arm Drag, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Darby Allin’s PWG tenure, though brief, showcased his fearless and unique approach to wrestling. His high-risk offense and underdog mentality earned him recognition, particularly in multi-man matches.

Dave Crist
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2016 and 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: High-flying with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Superkick, Moonsault.
Brief description: As part of a tag team with his brother Jake Crist, Dave Crist brought his fast-paced and dynamic style to PWG. Their matches added excitement and variety to the promotion’s tag team division during their appearances.

Davey Richards
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2006 to 2017.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical striker with a focus on submissions and hard-hitting offense.
Signature moves: DR Driver, Kimura Lock, Alarm Clock.
Brief description: Davey Richards was a staple of PWG’s roster for over a decade, known for his incredible technical skill and intensity. As part of the American Wolves with Eddie Edwards and in singles action, he delivered standout performances in tournaments and high-profile matches, solidifying his place as a PWG icon.

Demonic Flamita
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2019 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with a dark, aggressive edge.
Signature moves: Thrill of the Kill, Spanish Fly, Superkick.
Brief description: Transitioning from Flamita to his darker persona, Demonic Flamita has become a key figure in PWG. His matches blend high-flying lucha libre with a more ruthless and intense style, making him a standout in PWG’s recent events and tournaments.

Dezmond Xavier
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in tag team action.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative aerialist.
Signature moves: Spiral Tap, Final Flash, Handspring Cutter.
Brief description: As part of The Rascalz alongside Trey Miguel and Zachary Wentz, Dezmond Xavier brought a high-octane style to PWG. Their matches were a staple of PWG’s tag team division, featuring innovative sequences and breathtaking athleticism that made The Rascalz fan favorites.

Delirious
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Eccentric technical grappler with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Shadows Over Hell, Cobra Stretch, Panic Attack.
Brief description: Delirious’s unique character and unpredictable in-ring style added an entertaining dynamic to PWG. His appearances were memorable for their mix of comedy and technical wrestling, delighting fans during his tenure.

Dino Winwood
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2008, primarily as a manager.
Position on the card: Manager and occasional enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Managerial antics with comedic wrestling elements.
Signature moves: Schoolboy Roll-Up, Corner Splash, Low Blow.
Brief description: Dino Winwood was a beloved comedic presence in PWG, primarily as a manager for tag teams like Arrogance (Chris Bosh & Scott Lost). His over-the-top personality and occasional in-ring appearances added levity and entertainment to PWG events.

Disco Machine
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card to enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Comedic grappler with lucha libre elements.
Signature moves: Chokebreaker, Disco Bomb, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: As one of PWG’s founders, Disco Machine was instrumental in the promotion’s early years. His mix of comedy and solid wrestling ability made him a reliable performer and fan favorite in PWG’s formative era.

DJ Z (Joaquin Wilde)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid with a flashy presentation.
Signature moves: ZDT, 450 Splash, Springboard DDT.
Brief description: DJ Z brought his dynamic and crowd-pleasing style to PWG, delivering exciting performances in multi-man matches. His flashy offense and unique character fit well within the PWG landscape.

Dojo Bros (Roderick Strong & Eddie Edwards)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2012 and 2013.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Knee Gutbuster, Boston Knee Party, Half-and-Half Suplex.
Brief description: The Dojo Bros combined the intensity of Roderick Strong and Eddie Edwards, delivering excellent matches in PWG’s competitive tag team division. Their physical style and chemistry made them a standout team during their tenure.

Donovan Dijak (T-Bar)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2016 to 2017.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with high-flying agility for a big man.
Signature moves: Feast Your Eyes, Chokebreaker, Springboard Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Donovan Dijak impressed PWG fans with his combination of power and athleticism. His performances in singles and multi-man matches, including the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments, showcased his versatility and potential as a breakout star.

Drago
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high flyer with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Dragon's Tail Roll-Up, Tornillo Plancha, Running Flip DDT.
Brief description: As a standout from Lucha Underground, Drago brought his unique brand of aerial offense and lucha libre style to PWG. His matches were high-energy displays of agility, often in multi-man bouts that thrilled audiences.

Dragon Kid
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre specialist.
Signature moves: Dragon Rana, Christo, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: A star from Dragon Gate, Dragon Kid brought his fast-paced, acrobatic style to PWG. His appearances added an international flair to PWG events, showcasing his innovative offense in memorable multi-man matches.

Dragon Lee
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre hybrid of high-flying and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Desnucadora, Double Knee Strike, Tope Con Hilo.
Brief description: Dragon Lee has become a key figure in PWG, delivering show-stealing performances against top-tier opponents. His dynamic and explosive style has made him a standout in both singles competition and tag team matches.

Drake Younger
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2012 to 2014.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Hardcore-inspired brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Drake’s Landing, Death Valley Driver, Exploder Suplex.
Brief description: Drake Younger was a fan favorite in PWG, known for his fearless style and ability to deliver in intense matches. His performances in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and Guerrilla Warfare bouts were highlights of his tenure.

Drew Galloway (Drew McIntyre)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Future Shock DDT, Claymore Kick, Reverse Alabama Slam.
Brief description: Drew Galloway’s PWG run showcased his reinvention on the independent scene. His matches featured a mix of power and intensity, allowing him to shine against PWG’s top-tier talent in high-profile encounters.

Drew Gulak
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a focus on submissions and mat wrestling.
Signature moves: Gu-Lock, Dragon Sleeper, Spine Splitter.
Brief description: Drew Gulak’s time in PWG emphasized his technical expertise and methodical approach to wrestling. His performances in singles and tag team matches earned him respect for his old-school grappling style in a high-flying-dominated promotion.

Dustin Cutler
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Cutler Driver, Tandem Springboard Suplex, Moonsault.
Brief description: Dustin Cutler, teaming with his brother Brandon as the Cutler Brothers, played a significant role in PWG’s tag team division. Their high-flying tandem offense added depth to the promotion’s roster during their tenure.

Dynasty (Joey Ryan & Scott Lost)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2007.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and grounded tag team wrestling with heel tactics.
Signature moves: That 70’s Kick, Lost Cause, Tandem Superkick.
Brief description: As a prominent tag team in PWG, The Dynasty showcased strong chemistry and heel charisma. Their performances, both as a duo and in association with other factions, helped establish PWG’s tag team division in its early years.

Eddie Edwards
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2010 to 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting technical grappler with striking elements.
Signature moves: Boston Knee Party, Die Hard Driver, Half-and-Half Suplex.
Brief description: Eddie Edwards was a standout in PWG, both as a singles competitor and as one half of The American Wolves alongside Davey Richards. His intense matches in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and title bouts solidified his legacy in PWG.

Eddie Kingston
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2011 and 2012.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with strong psychology and intense promos.
Signature moves: Backfist to the Future, Sliding D, Spinning Backfist.
Brief description: Eddie Kingston’s PWG appearances showcased his hard-hitting style and unparalleled charisma. His gritty, emotional performances left a lasting impression on fans, highlighting his ability to tell compelling stories in the ring.

El Generico (Sami Zayn)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2013.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid with crowd-pleasing charisma.
Signature moves: Brainbustaaaaah!!!, Helluva Kick, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: El Generico was one of the most beloved and iconic figures in PWG history. His matches against Kevin Steen, as well as his contributions to the tag team division with partners like Paul London and Quicksilver, are legendary. A former PWG World Champion, Generico is synonymous with PWG’s rise in the independent wrestling scene.

El Hijo del Vikingo
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre innovator with high-flying and acrobatic offense.
Signature moves: Imploding 450 Splash, Reverse 630 Senton, Tornillo Plancha.
Brief description: El Hijo del Vikingo’s electrifying style and death-defying maneuvers have made him a standout in PWG’s contemporary roster. His ability to perform awe-inspiring feats has drawn attention from fans and critics alike.

Eli Everfly
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with unorthodox and daring offense.
Signature moves: Dragonrana, Springboard Cutter, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Eli Everfly’s brief appearances in PWG showcased his fearless, high-risk style. His agility and creativity in multi-man matches earned him recognition as a promising talent in the independent scene.

Ethan Page
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with comedic and psychological elements.
Signature moves: Spinning Dwayne, RK-Ego, Package Piledriver.
Brief description: Ethan Page brought a mix of charisma, humor, and solid in-ring ability to PWG. His singles matches and participation in tournaments, including the Battle of Los Angeles, highlighted his versatility and ability to entertain fans.

Evil Uno
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2008 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Grounded, brawling style with creative offense.
Signature moves: Fatality, Swanton Bomb, Rope-Assisted Flatliner.
Brief description: Competing as part of the Super Smash Bros alongside Player Uno (later Stu Grayson), Evil Uno brought a unique blend of power and innovation to PWG’s tag team division. Their chemistry and distinctive gimmick made them a fan favorite.

Excalibur
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2006, transitioned to commentator thereafter.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a wrestler, iconic commentator.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic hybrid.
Signature moves: Tiger Driver, Moonsault, Crossface Chickenwing.
Brief description: As one of PWG’s founders, Excalibur played a vital role in establishing the promotion. While his in-ring career was brief, he transitioned into commentary, where his wit and encyclopedic wrestling knowledge became a cornerstone of PWG events.

Famous B
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2011 to 2013.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with flashy offense.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Superkick, Springboard DDT.
Brief description: Famous B brought charisma and excitement to PWG’s mid-card with his high-energy style. Known for his crowd-pleasing moves, he was a reliable performer in multi-man matches and singles bouts.

Fenix
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flyer with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Black Fire Driver, Rolling Cutter, Tornillo Plancha.
Brief description: Fenix quickly became a fan favorite in PWG with his breathtaking agility and creativity. His matches, both in singles and tag team action (often alongside his brother Penta El Zero M), have been highlights of PWG events, including Battle of Los Angeles tournaments.

Fergal Devitt (Finn Bálor)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2009 and 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: Bloody Sunday, Coup de Grâce, Reverse 1916.
Brief description: Before becoming an international star, Fergal Devitt showcased his talent in PWG. His performances featured a blend of technical precision and athleticism, contributing to the promotion’s reputation for hosting world-class talent.

Fightin' Taylor Boys (Brian Cage-Taylor & Ryan Taylor)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2012 to 2013.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Taylor Made Driver, Assisted Suplex, Corner Elbow Smash.
Brief description: The Fightin' Taylor Boys added a unique flavor to PWG’s tag team division with their combination of power and technical ability. Their comedic timing and chemistry made them a memorable duo during their run.

Flamita
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2016 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flyer with technical elements.
Signature moves: Thrill of the Kill, Springboard 450 Splash, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Flamita’s athletic and innovative style made him a standout in PWG’s competitive roster. His matches, particularly in tag team bouts and multi-man contests, were highlights of PWG events, showcasing his versatility and flair.

Forever Hooligans (Alex Koslov & Rocky Romero)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2013 to 2014.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Contract Killer, Russian Leg Sweep, Double Superkick.
Brief description: The Forever Hooligans brought their New Japan Pro Wrestling experience to PWG, engaging in thrilling tag team matches. Their chemistry and dynamic style made them a formidable duo in the promotion’s tag team division.

Frankie Kazarian
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: Flux Capacitor, Wave of the Future, Slingshot DDT.
Brief description: Frankie Kazarian was a consistent presence in PWG, delivering strong performances in both singles and tag team competition. His long-standing partnership with Christopher Daniels as part of The Addiction brought star power to the tag team division.

Fred Yehi
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Koji Clutch, Half-and-Half Suplex, Gutwrench Powerbomb.
Brief description: Fred Yehi brought his intense technical style to PWG, showcasing his ability to control matches with a mix of aggression and precision. His performances against top-tier opponents highlighted his skills in PWG’s competitive environment.

Future Shock (Adam Cole & Kyle O’Reilly)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2010 to 2012.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid tag team.
Signature moves: Ride the Lightning, Brainbuster/Front Suplex Combo, Superkick/Leg Sweep Combo.
Brief description: Future Shock was a dynamic and innovative tag team in PWG, delivering standout matches against teams like The Young Bucks and Super Smash Bros. Their chemistry and ability to blend technical wrestling with high-flying offense made them a highlight of PWG’s tag team division.

Generation Me (The Young Bucks: Matt & Nick Jackson)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2007 to present.
Position on the card: Main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying, fast-paced tag team wrestling with showmanship.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck, Meltzer Driver, Superkick Party.
Brief description: Known as Generation Me during their early career, The Young Bucks became one of PWG’s most iconic teams. Their groundbreaking matches redefined tag team wrestling, and their rivalries with teams like The Motor City Machine Guns and The Super Smash Bros solidified their legacy as PWG mainstays.

Genki Horiguchi
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flyer.
Signature moves: Beach Break, Backslide from Heaven, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: A standout from Dragon Gate, Genki Horiguchi brought his high-energy style to PWG. His performances in multi-man matches highlighted his agility and charisma, adding an international flair to PWG events.

Gran Akuma
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Falcon Arrow, Yoshi Tonic, Moonsault Double Stomp.
Brief description: Gran Akuma delivered solid performances during his PWG appearances, combining strong strikes with innovative offense. His matches showcased his versatility and ability to adapt to PWG’s fast-paced style.

Gunning For Hookers (Dustin Cutler & Brandon Cutler)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Cutler Driver, Assisted Springboard Suplex, Tandem DDT.
Brief description: As a renamed version of the Cutler Brothers, Gunning For Hookers brought their energetic and cohesive tag team style to PWG. Their performances in PWG’s tag team division were entertaining and showcased their growth as a duo.

Hangman Page
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2016 and 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Striker with technical and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Buckshot Lariat, Rite of Passage, Slingshot Plancha.
Brief description: Hangman Page brought his confident persona and hard-hitting style to PWG, competing in singles and multi-man matches. His performances showcased his potential as a rising star during his brief tenure.

Hardkore Kidd (Aaron Aguilera)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Big Boot, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Hardkore Kidd was a notable presence in PWG’s early years, contributing to the promotion’s foundation with his brawling style and larger-than-life persona. He participated in both singles and tag team matches, often using his size and strength to dominate opponents.

Havana Pitbulls (Ricky Reyes & Rocky Romero)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Team Backbreaker, Dragon Sleeper, Leg Lariat.
Brief description: The Havana Pitbulls were a key team in PWG’s formative years, known for their intense matches and technical precision. Their tag team chemistry and rivalry with other top teams helped establish PWG’s tag team division.

Homicide
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2006.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Brawler with strong technical and hardcore elements.
Signature moves: Cop Killa, Gringo Cutter, Lariat.
Brief description: Homicide was a standout in PWG’s early years, delivering intense, hard-hitting matches. His fierce rivalries and hardcore style made him a fan favorite and a crucial part of PWG’s growth as a home for diverse wrestling styles.

Hook Bomberry
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with submission elements.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Suplex, Armbar, Back Suplex.
Brief description: Hook Bomberry was a reliable performer in PWG’s early roster, known for his technical skills and adaptability. His consistent performances helped establish a strong foundation for the promotion’s mid-card.

HookGun (Hook Bomberry & Top Gun Talwar)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Grounded technical and comedic tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Assisted Splash, Double Lariat.
Brief description: HookGun was a unique tag team in PWG’s early years, combining technical wrestling with comedic timing. Their entertaining dynamic and solid in-ring work made them a crowd-pleasing duo.

Human Tornado
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2010, with sporadic returns later.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Pimp Slap, Tornado DDT, House Party.
Brief description: Human Tornado was one of PWG’s most charismatic and unique performers. Known for his humorous persona and high-energy style, he became a fan favorite, delivering memorable matches and moments during his tenure.

Icarus
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with heel tendencies.
Signature moves: Blu-Ray, Pedigree, Shiranui.
Brief description: Icarus brought his distinct personality and technical wrestling to PWG, participating in multi-man matches and representing CHIKARA talent. His performances showcased his versatility in a variety of match types.

Inner City Machine Guns (Ricochet & Rich Swann)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2012 to 2015.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying tag team with fast-paced and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Standing 450 Splash, Chasing the Dragon, Double Rotation Moonsault.
Brief description: Inner City Machine Guns were a dynamic and electrifying duo in PWG, delivering some of the promotion’s most thrilling tag team matches. Their chemistry and creative offense made them a staple of the tag division during their run.

Jack Cartwheel
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2021 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic hybrid.
Signature moves: Cartwheel Death Valley Driver, Springboard Moonsault, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Jack Cartwheel quickly gained attention in PWG with his incredible agility and innovative offense. His performances in singles and multi-man matches have made him a rising star in PWG’s current roster.

Jack Evans
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2014.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with a focus on agility and aerial stunts.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Phoenix Splash, Springboard Corkscrew Kick.
Brief description: Jack Evans was a fixture of PWG’s high-flying division, delivering jaw-dropping aerial performances in singles and tag team matches. His ability to captivate audiences with his athleticism and charisma made him a fan favorite.

Jade Chung
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2006, primarily as a manager.
Position on the card: Manager.
Wrestling style: Managerial presence with occasional in-ring involvement.
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: Jade Chung was a prominent manager in PWG, adding dramatic flair to matches involving her clients. Her presence at ringside added storytelling depth to the promotion’s events during her tenure.

Jake Atlas
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2018 to 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: LGB-DDT, Cartwheel DDT, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Jake Atlas was a standout in PWG, known for his athleticism and innovative moves. His performances in singles matches and tournaments, including the Battle of Los Angeles, showcased his potential as one of the top rising stars in the independent scene.

Jake Crist
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2016 and 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: High-flying with strong technical elements.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Suicide Dive, Tower of London.
Brief description: As part of a tag team with his brother Dave Crist, Jake Crist delivered exciting performances in PWG’s competitive tag division. His high-energy style made him a standout in multi-man and tag team bouts.

James Gibson (Jamie Noble)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Trailer Hitch, Gibson Driver, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Before returning to WWE, James Gibson brought his exceptional technical skills to PWG, delivering solid matches that highlighted his expertise in mat wrestling and storytelling.

Jay Briscoe
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2007 to 2013.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with high-impact offense.
Signature moves: Jay Driller, Froggy Bow, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Jay Briscoe, alongside his brother Mark as the Briscoe Brothers, delivered some of PWG’s most intense and hard-hitting tag team matches. Their rivalries with teams like The Young Bucks showcased their chemistry and helped solidify PWG’s tag team division.

Jay Lethal
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Lethal Injection, Figure Four Leglock, Hail to the King.
Brief description: Jay Lethal’s time in PWG showcased his versatility and charisma. His matches highlighted his technical proficiency and ability to connect with fans, adding star power to PWG’s mid-2000s cards.

Jay White
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2017 and 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical striker with psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Blade Runner, Sleeper Suplex, Kiwi Crusher.
Brief description: Before becoming a global star, Jay White competed in PWG, showcasing his sharp technical style and ability to craft compelling matches. His performances against top-tier opponents marked him as a standout in PWG’s competitive roster.

JD Drake
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with agility for a heavyweight.
Signature moves: Drill Bit, Cannonball Senton, Moonsault.
Brief description: JD Drake impressed PWG audiences with his blend of power and agility. His performances in singles and multi-man matches demonstrated his versatility and ability to hang with PWG’s best talent.

Jeff Cobb
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2016 to present.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappler with suplex-heavy offense.
Signature moves: Tour of the Islands, German Suplex, Standing Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Jeff Cobb has been a dominant force in PWG, winning the PWG World Championship and consistently delivering incredible performances. His mix of strength, agility, and technical skill has made him one of PWG’s standout stars.

Jigsaw
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Jig ‘n’ Tonic, Superkick, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Representing CHIKARA, Jigsaw brought his innovative and agile style to PWG. His matches featured a mix of aerial maneuvers and technical prowess, earning him recognition in PWG’s competitive mid-card scene.

Jimmy Jacobs
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2005 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Psychological brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Contra Code, End Time, Senton Splash.
Brief description: Jimmy Jacobs brought his intense and theatrical style to PWG, delivering compelling performances both as a singles competitor and in tag team action. His storytelling ability and unique presence made him a memorable part of PWG’s roster during his appearances.

Jimmy Rave
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005 and 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Rave Clash, Satellite Crossface, Heel Hook.
Brief description: Jimmy Rave’s time in PWG featured strong technical performances, often playing the role of a conniving heel. His character work and in-ring ability contributed to some engaging mid-card matches.

Jimmy Yang
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2004.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking elements.
Signature moves: Yang Time, Corkscrew Moonsault, Springboard Clothesline.
Brief description: Jimmy Yang’s PWG appearances showcased his agility and aerial expertise, contributing exciting matches during the promotion’s early years. His energetic style made him a notable presence on the card.

Jody Fleisch
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2003 and 2004.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic aerialist.
Signature moves: 720 DDT, Shooting Star Press, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: As one of the UK’s premier high-flyers, Jody Fleisch brought his innovative aerial maneuvers to PWG, delivering exciting and fast-paced performances. His matches added an international flavor to PWG’s early cards.

Joey Janela
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Risk-taking brawler with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver, Superkick, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Joey Janela’s tenure in PWG featured a mix of hardcore and high-flying action, solidifying his reputation as a daredevil performer. His matches, including memorable bouts in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments, showcased his versatility and willingness to push boundaries.

Joey Ryan
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Comedic grappler with technical elements.
Signature moves: YouPorn Plex, Mustache Ride, Superkick.
Brief description: Joey Ryan was a key figure in PWG’s history, known for blending humor with wrestling skill. As a singles competitor and part of "The World’s Cutest Tag Team" with Candice LeRae, Ryan delivered memorable moments and entertaining matches that contributed to PWG’s unique identity.

John Hennigan (Johnny Nitro/John Morrison)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2007 to 2015, with sporadic appearances afterward.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and parkour-inspired offense.
Signature moves: Starship Pain, Moonlight Drive, Spanish Fly.
Brief description: John Hennigan brought his athletic and innovative style to PWG, becoming a staple of the promotion’s top-tier matches. His performances in singles and tag team competition highlighted his charisma and in-ring ability, earning him a prominent spot on PWG’s cards.

John Silver
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2018 and 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappler with high-energy offense.
Signature moves: Spin Doctor, Brainbuster, Superkick.
Brief description: John Silver brought his unique blend of strength and speed to PWG, showcasing his explosive style in multi-man matches. His charisma and in-ring intensity quickly made him a fan favorite.

Johnny Gargano
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2013 to 2016.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: Gargano Escape, Lawn Dart, Slingshot DDT.
Brief description: Johnny Gargano became a cornerstone of PWG’s mid-2010s roster, delivering standout performances in singles matches and tag team competition with Chuck Taylor as part of “Candice and Joey.” His ability to connect with fans and craft memorable matches made him one of PWG’s top stars.

Johnny Goodtime
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic grappler.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Frog Splash, Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors.
Brief description: Johnny Goodtime added humor and excitement to PWG’s roster, often teaming with Johnny Yuma as part of the RockNES Monsters. Their fast-paced and entertaining matches became a highlight of PWG’s tag team division.

Johnny Yuma
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Agile high-flyer with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Dropkick, Swinging Neckbreaker.
Brief description: As one-half of the RockNES Monsters alongside Johnny Goodtime, Johnny Yuma brought energy and humor to PWG. Their matches showcased innovative teamwork and a fun dynamic that entertained PWG audiences.

Jonah Rock (JONAH)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based wrestler with surprising agility.
Signature moves: Tsunami Splash, Death Valley Driver, Sitout Powerbomb.
Brief description: Jonah Rock (later JONAH) quickly became a force in PWG with his dominating presence and athletic ability. His matches against top talent in the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments showcased his ability to deliver main-event-level performances.

Jonathan Gresham
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission specialist.
Signature moves: Octopus Stretch, Bridging German Suplex, Tope Suicida.
Brief description: Jonathan Gresham’s time in PWG highlighted his mastery of technical wrestling and mat-based offense. His precise style and ability to adapt to various opponents made him a standout performer in PWG’s competitive environment.

Jonny Storm
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2004.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Rewind Rana, Stormin’ Cutter, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Jonny Storm brought his UK high-flying expertise to PWG during its early years, delivering fast-paced and exciting matches. His appearances showcased his athleticism and international flair.

Josh Alexander
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2018 and 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based technical grappler with strong suplex variations.
Signature moves: C4 Spike, Ankle Lock, Double Underhook Piledriver.
Brief description: Josh Alexander brought his hard-hitting and technical style to PWG, competing in highly competitive singles and tag team matches. His performances emphasized his toughness and versatility, standing out in PWG’s diverse roster.

Jungle Boy
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2018 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with agility and technical elements.
Signature moves: Snare Trap, Springboard DDT, Tope Suicida.
Brief description: Jungle Boy quickly gained popularity in PWG with his athleticism and crowd connection. His performances in singles and multi-man matches highlighted his potential as a rising star in the independent wrestling scene.

Jushin Thunder Liger
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid with lucha libre influences.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Liger Bomb, Shotei Palm Strike.
Brief description: The legendary Jushin Thunder Liger’s PWG appearances were a special attraction, showcasing his iconic style and unparalleled experience. His matches provided PWG fans a chance to witness a wrestling legend in action, adding prestige to the events he participated in.

KAGETORA
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with strong technical elements.
Signature moves: Kagenui, Ikkitousen, Moonsault.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, KAGETORA brought his innovative and fast-paced style to PWG. His performances in multi-man matches showcased his versatility and added an international flavor to the promotion.

KAI
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2008.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting with striking and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Splash Plancha, Tidal Wave, Phoenix Splash.
Brief description: KAI delivered exciting performances during his time in PWG, bringing his Japanese wrestling expertise to the promotion. His participation in multi-man and singles matches helped showcase his diverse skill set to PWG audiences.

Kamaitachi (Hiromu Takahashi)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Time Bomb, Diving Senton, Superkick.
Brief description: Competing in PWG as Kamaitachi, Hiromu Takahashi brought his high-energy and dynamic style to matches against top-tier opponents. His innovative offense and intensity were highlights of his brief PWG tenure.

Karl Anderson
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Gun Stun, Spinebuster, Rocket Kick.
Brief description: Before achieving international fame, Karl Anderson showcased his hard-hitting and charismatic style in PWG. His matches reflected his potential to become a major player in professional wrestling.

Keith Lee
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based with surprising agility.
Signature moves: Spirit Bomb, Big Bang Catastrophe, Pounce.
Brief description: Keith Lee’s PWG tenure was marked by show-stealing performances against some of the promotion’s best talent. His blend of size, strength, and athleticism made him an instant fan favorite, and his matches in the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments were widely acclaimed.

Kenny Omega
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2014, with sporadic appearances later.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: One-Winged Angel, V-Trigger, Croyt’s Wrath.
Brief description: Kenny Omega became one of PWG’s most celebrated stars, delivering classic matches against the likes of Bryan Danielson and El Generico. His charismatic personality and in-ring versatility made him a cornerstone of PWG’s roster during his tenure.

Kevin Blackwood
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting striker with technical elements.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Half-and-Half Suplex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Kevin Blackwood’s PWG tenure showcased his intense, no-nonsense style, often against high-caliber opponents. His performances in multi-man matches demonstrated his potential as a rising star in the independent scene.

Kevin Steen (Kevin Owens)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2014.
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with high-flying and technical elements.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver, Sharpshooter, Cannonball.
Brief description: Kevin Steen was one of PWG’s biggest stars, known for his hard-hitting matches and charismatic promos. As a multiple-time PWG World Champion, Steen headlined some of the promotion’s most iconic matches, including rivalries with El Generico and The Young Bucks.

Kikutaro
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Comedic grappler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Small Package, Eye Poke.
Brief description: Kikutaro’s appearances in PWG brought a unique blend of humor and solid wrestling. His comedic timing and ability to entertain audiences made him a fan favorite during his tenure.

Kings of the Black Throne (Malakai Black & Brody King)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2021 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based hybrid tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Dante’s Inferno, Assisted Powerbomb, Roundhouse Kick Combo.
Brief description: The Kings of the Black Throne have been a dominant force in PWG’s tag team division, blending Malakai Black’s striking precision with Brody King’s brute strength. Their intense matches against top teams have made them a highlight of PWG’s modern era.

Kings of Wrestling (Chris Hero & Claudio Castagnoli)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2011.
Position on the card: Main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking hybrid with innovative tandem offense.
Signature moves: KRS-One, Giant Swing/Dropkick Combo, Doomsday Uppercut.
Brief description: The Kings of Wrestling were a dominant tag team in PWG, delivering classic matches and redefining tag team wrestling in the independent scene. Their chemistry and in-ring innovation made them one of the most celebrated duos in PWG history.

Komander
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre innovator.
Signature moves: Tightrope Walk Shooting Star Press, Tope Con Hilo, Tornillo Plancha.
Brief description: Komander’s breathtaking aerial abilities have made him a standout in PWG’s recent roster. His innovative moves and death-defying style have drawn significant attention from fans and critics alike.

Konosuke Takeshita
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2022.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical hybrid with explosive offense.
Signature moves: Zahi Knee Strike, Bridging German Suplex, Crossover Lariat.
Brief description: Konosuke Takeshita quickly became a sensation in PWG with his powerful and agile style. His performances against top talent have cemented his reputation as one of the best wrestlers in the world.

Kyle Fletcher
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2022 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as part of a tag team.
Wrestling style: Agile high-flyer with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Grimstone, Assisted Cutter, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: As one half of Aussie Open with Mark Davis, Kyle Fletcher has been a pivotal part of PWG’s tag team division. Their explosive matches against top teams have cemented Aussie Open as one of the premier duos in the promotion’s modern era.

Kyle O’Reilly
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2010 to 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, both in singles and tag team action.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking and submission-based offense.
Signature moves: Guillotine Choke, Armageddon, Regalplex.
Brief description: Kyle O’Reilly made a significant impact in PWG as a singles competitor and as part of Future Shock with Adam Cole and ReDRagon with Bobby Fish. His technical prowess and ability to deliver high-caliber matches made him a staple in PWG during his tenure.

Laredo Kid
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre innovator.
Signature moves: Spanish Fly, Moonsault, Suicide Dive Headbutt.
Brief description: Laredo Kid’s performances in PWG have showcased his incredible agility and creativity. His exciting lucha libre style has made him a standout in multi-man matches and high-stakes singles contests.

Larry Sweeney
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Charismatic technical wrestler with comedic elements.
Signature moves: 12 Large Elbow Drop, Piledriver, Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Larry Sweeney brought his larger-than-life personality and old-school charisma to PWG. His comedic yet technically sound matches left a lasting impression on fans during his brief tenure.

Latin American Xchange (LAX - Santana & Ortiz)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawling with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper, Sitout Powerbomb/Blockbuster Combo, Cannonball Splash.
Brief description: LAX became one of PWG’s premier tag teams, engaging in intense and dynamic matches against teams like The Young Bucks. Their charisma and innovative offense made them a highlight of PWG’s tag team division.

Leaders of the New School (Zack Sabre Jr. & Marty Scurll)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Armbar Stretch, Tandem Suplex, Crossface Chickenwing.
Brief description: Representing the UK scene, Leaders of the New School brought their technical expertise and creative teamwork to PWG. Their matches highlighted their chemistry and helped introduce a new wave of British wrestling talent to PWG fans.

Lee Moriarty
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking elements and high agility.
Signature moves: Taiga Style Suplex, Border City Stretch, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Lee Moriarty’s PWG appearances have showcased his technical skill and unique wrestling style. His performances in singles matches and tournaments highlighted his adaptability and growing prominence on the independent scene.

Lil Cholo
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Moonsault, Suicide Dive, Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Lil Cholo was a key part of PWG’s early roster, delivering exciting and fast-paced matches. His lucha libre style and charisma made him a fan favorite during the promotion’s formative years.

Lio Rush
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced striker.
Signature moves: Final Hour, Come Up, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Lio Rush brought his electrifying speed and aerial ability to PWG, competing in thrilling matches that highlighted his athleticism. His performances in singles and multi-man matches made him a standout during his appearances.

Los Luchas (Phoenix Star & Zokre)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Traditional lucha libre tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Tandem Moonsault, Springboard Arm Drag, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Los Luchas were a vital part of PWG’s early tag team division, showcasing traditional lucha libre techniques. Their fast-paced and high-flying style made them crowd favorites in the promotion’s early years.

Low Ki
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting striker with technical and submission elements.
Signature moves: Ki Krusher, Warrior’s Way, Dragon Clutch.
Brief description: Low Ki’s PWG appearances were marked by his intensity and hard-hitting style. His matches against top-tier opponents added prestige to PWG’s cards, showcasing his skill and ferocity.

Lucha Brothers (Rey Fenix & Penta El Zero M)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking hybrid lucha libre.
Signature moves: Fear Factor, Package Piledriver/Double Stomp Combo, Tornillo Plancha.
Brief description: The Lucha Brothers are one of PWG’s most celebrated tag teams, delivering breathtaking matches against the likes of The Young Bucks and other top-tier teams. Their explosive offense and unmatched chemistry have made them a cornerstone of PWG’s modern era.

M-Dogg (Matt Cross)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2006, with sporadic returns later.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic aerialist.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Death Star Driver, Cartwheel Moonsault.
Brief description: M-Dogg (Matt Cross) was one of the standout high-flyers in PWG’s early years. His innovative aerial maneuvers and crowd-pleasing style made him a fixture in multi-man matches and singles bouts.

Malakai Black
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Main event.
Wrestling style: Striker with technical and submission elements.
Signature moves: Black Mass, Roundhouse Kick, Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Malakai Black brought his intense and calculated in-ring style to PWG, delivering main-event-caliber matches. His performances against some of PWG’s top talents showcased his striking ability and storytelling prowess.

Mando Guerrero
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: No verified appearances.
Position on the card: N/A.
Wrestling style: N/A.
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: While a respected figure in lucha libre, there are no documented PWG appearances for Mando Guerrero.

Mark Andrews
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with a focus on speed and agility.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Stundog Millionaire, Tope Con Hilo.
Brief description: Mark Andrews brought his high-octane aerial offense to PWG, showcasing his agility and crowd connection. His performances in multi-man matches highlighted his adaptability and creativity in the ring.

Mark Briscoe
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2007 to 2013.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as part of a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying brawler with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Froggy Bow, Cut-Throat Driver, Exploder Suplex.
Brief description: Alongside his brother Jay as the Briscoe Brothers, Mark Briscoe contributed to PWG’s tag team division with hard-hitting and fast-paced matches. Their intense rivalries, including bouts with The Young Bucks, helped solidify PWG’s reputation as a hub for elite tag team wrestling.

Mark Davis
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2022 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as part of a tag team.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Coriolis, Dental Plan, Running Lariat.
Brief description: As one half of Aussie Open with Kyle Fletcher, Mark Davis brought a commanding and physical presence to PWG’s tag team division. Their innovative offense and chemistry have made them one of the most celebrated tag teams in PWG’s current era.

Mark Haskins
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Made in England, Cradle to the Grave, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Mark Haskins brought his hybrid wrestling style to PWG, delivering solid performances in singles and multi-man matches. His adaptability and technical expertise made him a valuable addition to the roster during his appearances.

Marko Stunt
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying underdog with a focus on agility.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Springboard Cutter, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Marko Stunt’s PWG appearances showcased his fearless and high-energy style, often overcoming his smaller stature with creative and daring offense. His performances brought a unique underdog dynamic to PWG’s shows.

Martin Stone (Danny Burch)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical striker with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Tower of London, Spinebuster, Crossface.
Brief description: Martin Stone’s hard-hitting style and technical ability added variety to PWG’s mid-card during his appearances. His intensity and adaptability made him a notable competitor on PWG’s stacked roster.

Marty Scurll
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2016 to 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based with strong character work.
Signature moves: Crossface Chickenwing, Graduation, Tower of London.
Brief description: Marty Scurll became a standout in PWG due to his mix of technical ability and villainous persona. His matches, particularly in the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments, showcased his ability to deliver compelling and high-stakes performances.

Masaaki Mochizuki
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Striker with strong technical and submission elements.
Signature moves: Twister, Shin Saikyo High Kick, Triangle Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, Masaaki Mochizuki brought his precise striking and technical expertise to PWG. His appearances added an international flair to the promotion and showcased his experience and versatility.

Masada
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2004 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Masadamizer, Death Valley Driver, Suplex Powerbomb.
Brief description: Known for his work in hardcore wrestling, Masada brought his physical and intense style to PWG. His matches often emphasized his toughness and adaptability in a variety of wrestling environments.

Masato Yoshino
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Lightning Spiral, Torbellino, Sol Naciente.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, Masato Yoshino brought his unparalleled speed and innovative offense to PWG. His performances in multi-man matches showcased his agility and added an international flair to PWG’s cards.

Matt Classic
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Old-school grappler with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Airplane Spin, Bear Hug, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Matt Classic’s retro gimmick and humorous style made his PWG appearances memorable. His character work and homage to classic wrestling brought a unique dynamic to PWG’s shows.

Matt Jackson
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2007 to present.
Position on the card: Main event as part of a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking tag team specialist.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck, Meltzer Driver, Superkick Party.
Brief description: As one half of The Young Bucks with Nick Jackson, Matt Jackson has been a cornerstone of PWG’s tag team division. Their innovative offense and legendary rivalries, particularly with teams like The Lucha Brothers, have defined PWG’s modern era.

Matt Riddle (Matthew Riddle)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Striker with MMA influence and grappling elements.
Signature moves: Bro Derek, Bromission, Floating Bro.
Brief description: Matt Riddle quickly became a standout in PWG with his laid-back persona and hard-hitting style. His performances in the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and main-event matches solidified his reputation as one of the best in the independent scene.

Matt Sydal
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2008, with sporadic appearances later.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying aerialist with technical finesse.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Cyclorama, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Matt Sydal’s time in PWG highlighted his incredible agility and innovative aerial offense. His matches against top-tier opponents were standout moments in PWG’s mid-2000s cards.

Max (Maxwell Jacob Friedman - MJF)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a focus on storytelling and psychology.
Signature moves: Salt of the Earth Armbar, Heat Seeker, Double Cross.
Brief description: MJF brought his brash persona and technical skill to PWG, quickly establishing himself as a master of crowd manipulation. His performances were as much about his in-ring ability as his ability to engage the audience with his character work.

Messiah
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Godsmack, Crucifix Powerbomb, Top-Rope Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A pivotal figure in PWG’s early years, Messiah’s intense and gritty style made him a standout performer. His rivalries and hardcore matches helped establish PWG as a destination for diverse wrestling styles.

MexaBlood (Bandido & Flamita)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2019 to 2021.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: 21 Plex, Thrill of the Kill, Tandem Spanish Fly.
Brief description: MexaBlood became a fan-favorite team in PWG, delivering jaw-dropping tag team matches that showcased their breathtaking agility and teamwork. Their chemistry and explosive offense made them one of PWG’s most dynamic duos.

Michael Elgin
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2012 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Elgin Bomb, Buckle Bomb, Deadlift Suplex.
Brief description: Michael Elgin was a dominant force in PWG, known for his hard-hitting style and impressive strength. His performances in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and main-event matches solidified his reputation as a top-tier talent.

Michael Oku
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Half-Crab, Fosbury Flop, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Michael Oku’s PWG appearances have highlighted his resilience and dynamic in-ring style. His ability to connect with fans and deliver captivating matches has made him a promising addition to the PWG roster.

Mick Moretti
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Morality Check, Cannonball Senton, Rope-Assisted DDT.
Brief description: Representing the Australian wrestling scene, Mick Moretti brought his unique persona and innovative style to PWG. His creative offense and character work have made him a standout in multi-man matches.

Mike Bailey
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Striker with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Ultima Weapon, Shooting Star Knee Drop, Tornado Kick.
Brief description: “Speedball” Mike Bailey is one of PWG’s most exciting performers, known for his blistering kicks and aerial prowess. His matches in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and singles bouts against top talent have been widely praised.

Mike Quackenbush
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and lucha libre hybrid.
Signature moves: Quackendriver, Swanton Bomb, Chikara Special.
Brief description: Mike Quackenbush brought his innovative technical style to PWG, representing CHIKARA. His ability to blend lucha libre with intricate submission holds made his appearances a treat for fans of technical wrestling.

Mikey Nicholls
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2012 and 2013.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Mikey Bomb, Death Valley Driver, Spinebuster.
Brief description: As part of TMDK (The Mighty Don’t Kneel) with Shane Haste, Mikey Nicholls showcased his strength and chemistry in tag team action. Their matches brought intensity and a unique energy to PWG’s tag team division.

MJF (Maxwell Jacob Friedman)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a focus on storytelling and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Salt of the Earth Armbar, Heat Seeker, Double Cross.
Brief description: MJF’s brief PWG tenure highlighted his sharp technical skills and exceptional crowd control. His brash persona and ability to generate heat added an entertaining dynamic to PWG’s roster during his appearances.

Monster Mafia (Josh Alexander & Ethan Page)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Power and technical hybrid tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Assisted Piledriver, Tandem Suplex, Double Team Spinebuster.
Brief description: Monster Mafia brought their hard-hitting and cohesive tag team style to PWG. Their performances showcased their chemistry and ability to stand out in a stacked tag team division.

Motor City Machine Guns (Chris Sabin & Alex Shelley)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2007 to 2009.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Made in Detroit, ASCS Rush, Skull and Bones.
Brief description: The Motor City Machine Guns delivered some of PWG’s most memorable tag team matches. Their blend of innovative offense and seamless teamwork made them a highlight of PWG’s tag division during their tenure.

Mount Rushmore (Kevin Steen, Adam Cole, The Young Bucks)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2013 to 2014.
Position on the card: Main event as a faction.
Wrestling style: Mix of power, technical wrestling, and high-flying.
Signature moves: Superkick Party, Package Piledriver, Panama Sunrise.
Brief description: Mount Rushmore was one of PWG’s most dominant and despised factions, wreaking havoc across the promotion. Their collective star power and ruthless tactics made them a defining group in PWG’s history.

Mr. Excitement
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Excitement Driver, Moonsault, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Mr. Excitement was a consistent performer in PWG’s early years, delivering exciting and dynamic matches. His innovative style contributed to the diversity of PWG’s early roster.

Myron Reed
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking elements.
Signature moves: No Cap Splash, Springboard Cutter, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Myron Reed brought his high-energy and innovative style to PWG, showcasing his aerial ability in multi-man and singles matches. His dynamic performances added excitement to the promotion’s contemporary roster.

Naruki Doi
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2006 and 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Doi 555, Bakatare Sliding Kick, Muscular Bomb.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, Naruki Doi delivered fast-paced and hard-hitting matches that highlighted his versatility. His performances added international flair and raised the bar for PWG’s in-ring action.

Nate Webb
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying brawler with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Spinebuster, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Nate Webb’s appearances in PWG showcased his mix of humor and high-risk offense. His charismatic presence and engaging in-ring style made him a memorable addition to the early PWG roster.

Necro Butcher
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2006 to 2009.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawler.
Signature moves: Tiger Driver, Death Valley Driver, Punch Flurry.
Brief description: Necro Butcher brought his hardcore wrestling expertise to PWG, engaging in brutal matches that left a lasting impression on fans. His unorthodox style and willingness to endure punishment made him a unique addition to PWG’s roster.

Nemesis
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Hurricanrana, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Nemesis was a consistent presence in PWG’s early years, delivering exciting and fast-paced matches. His performances helped establish the promotion’s reputation for showcasing diverse wrestling styles.

Nick Jackson
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2007 to present.
Position on the card: Main event as part of a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking tag team specialist.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck, Meltzer Driver, Superkick Party.
Brief description: As one half of The Young Bucks with Matt Jackson, Nick Jackson has been instrumental in PWG’s tag team division. Their innovative moves and legendary rivalries have solidified The Young Bucks as icons in PWG history.

Nigel McGuinness
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005 and 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Tower of London, Jawbreaker Lariat, Guvnor’s Crumpet.
Brief description: Nigel McGuinness showcased his technical and hard-hitting style during his PWG tenure. His matches against top-tier opponents were highlights of PWG’s mid-2000s cards, cementing his status as one of the best technical wrestlers of his era.


Here are the verified profiles for wrestlers and teams with documented contributions to Pro Wrestling Guerrilla (PWG). Wrestlers without verified appearances are excluded.

Nosawa
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2004.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and striking hybrid.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Rolling Senton, Shining Wizard.
Brief description: Nosawa brought his international experience and unique style to PWG, participating in fast-paced matches that added variety to PWG’s early cards.

Orange Cassidy
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2018 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Comedic grappler with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Orange Punch, Beach Break, Stundog Millionaire.
Brief description: Orange Cassidy’s laid-back persona and creative in-ring style made him a standout in PWG. His comedic timing and ability to seamlessly shift into intense sequences earned him praise as a unique talent.

Ortiz
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019 as part of LAX.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawler with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper, Cannonball Splash, Assisted Powerbomb.
Brief description: As one half of LAX with Santana, Ortiz brought intense and dynamic performances to PWG’s tag team division. Their matches against top teams like The Young Bucks were highlights of PWG events.

PAC
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2007 to 2011, with sporadic appearances later.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Black Arrow, Brutalizer, 450 Splash.
Brief description: PAC’s incredible agility and innovative offense made him a top performer in PWG. His matches against the likes of Kevin Steen and El Generico are regarded as classics, cementing his reputation as one of the best high-flyers in wrestling.

Paul London
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2012.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying with a mix of technical and comedic elements.
Signature moves: London Calling (Shooting Star Press), Dropsault, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Paul London became a fan favorite in PWG with his charismatic persona and aerial prowess. His matches, both in singles and as part of various tag teams, showcased his versatility and showmanship.

PCO (Pierre Carl Ouellet)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse brawler with high-risk elements.
Signature moves: PCO-sault, Package Piledriver, Cannonball Senton.
Brief description: PCO revitalized his career with his PWG appearances, bringing a mix of raw power and surprising agility. His performances, particularly in multi-man matches, drew attention for their intensity and unpredictability.

Peligro Abejas! (El Generico & Paul London)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2010 to 2011.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Tandem Brainbuster, Springboard Moonsault, Double Stomps.
Brief description: Peligro Abejas! was a short-lived but beloved team in PWG’s tag division. Combining El Generico’s charisma and Paul London’s aerial expertise, they delivered memorable matches and entertained fans with their chemistry.

Penta El Zero M (Penta El M)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Main event as a singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting lucha libre with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Fear Factor, Package Piledriver, Sling Blade.
Brief description: Penta El Zero M became a cornerstone of PWG’s roster, known for his intensity, crowd connection, and innovative matches. As part of the Lucha Brothers with Rey Fenix, he delivered some of the most memorable tag team matches in PWG history.

Pentagon Jr. (Penta El Zero M)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Main event as a singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting lucha libre with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Fear Factor, Package Piledriver, Sling Blade.
Brief description: Pentagon Jr. has become one of PWG’s top stars, delivering standout performances in singles and tag team action. As part of the Lucha Brothers with Rey Fenix, he has competed in some of PWG’s most memorable matches against top-tier teams and individuals.

Pete Dunne
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Bruiserweight style with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Bitter End, Finger Snap, X-Plex.
Brief description: Pete Dunne brought his aggressive and technical wrestling style to PWG, competing in singles and multi-man matches, including the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments. His unique style and charisma quickly made him a fan favorite.

Peter Avalon
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2009 to 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic grappler.
Signature moves: Marti-Knees, Golden Arch, Avalon Suplex.
Brief description: Peter Avalon contributed a mix of humor and technical ability to PWG, often participating in entertaining multi-man matches. His character work and in-ring adaptability made him a notable performer during his appearances.

Petey Williams
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005 and 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Canadian Destroyer, Sharpshooter, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Petey Williams brought his high-energy style and iconic Canadian Destroyer finisher to PWG. His performances against top independent talent showcased his versatility and athleticism.

Phoenix Star
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a singles competitor and tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Traditional lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Arm Drag, Moonsault, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: As part of Los Luchas with Zokre, Phoenix Star was a key figure in PWG’s early tag team division. His high-flying offense and teamwork brought excitement and variety to PWG’s cards.

Pinoy Boy (TJ Perkins)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: Detonation Kick, 450 Splash, Figure Four Deathlock.
Brief description: Wrestling as Pinoy Boy, TJ Perkins showcased his technical prowess and agility during PWG’s early years. His performances helped establish PWG as a home for diverse wrestling styles.

Player Dos (Stupefied)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2010 as part of the Super Smash Bros.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Fatality, 450 Splash, Tandem Moonsault.
Brief description: As one half of the Super Smash Bros. with Player Uno, Player Dos brought an exciting and innovative style to PWG’s tag team division. Their teamwork and creativity made them fan favorites during their tenure.

Player Uno (Evil Uno)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2010 as part of the Super Smash Bros.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Grounded brawler with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Fatality, Swanton Bomb, Flatliner.
Brief description: Player Uno, alongside Player Dos, was a key figure in PWG’s tag team division. Their blend of humor and innovative offense made their matches a highlight of PWG’s cards.

Portia Perez
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking elements.
Signature moves: Superkick, German Suplex, Crossface.
Brief description: Portia Perez brought her sharp technical skills and fiery personality to PWG, competing in singles and mixed-tag matches that added variety to the promotion’s roster.

PPRay (Peter Avalon & Ray Rosas)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2013 to 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Comedic and technical tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Superkick, Tandem Neckbreaker, Assisted Moonsault.
Brief description: PPRay added a mix of humor and athleticism to PWG’s tag team division. Their entertaining matches and lighthearted antics made them a crowd-pleasing duo during their time in the promotion.

Puma (TJ Perkins)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2008.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid with a masked persona.
Signature moves: Puma Suplex, Springboard Splash, Inverted Cloverleaf.
Brief description: Wrestling as Puma, TJ Perkins blended his technical expertise with lucha libre-inspired high-flying. His masked persona brought a unique flavor to PWG’s roster, and his matches were consistently strong throughout his run.

Quicksilver
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Silver Streak, Springboard DDT, Moonsault.
Brief description: Quicksilver was a key figure in PWG’s early years, competing as part of teams like Cape Fear alongside El Generico. His innovative offense and seamless tag team chemistry made him a standout in the promotion’s burgeoning tag division.

Rascalz (Dezmond Xavier, Zachary Wentz, & Trey Miguel)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event as a trio and in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: High-flying, fast-paced, and innovative tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Hot Fire Flame, Assisted Moonsault, Tandem Superkicks.
Brief description: The Rascalz brought their explosive energy and creativity to PWG, competing in thrilling tag and trios matches. Their chemistry and crowd-pleasing offense made them one of PWG’s most exciting modern acts.

Ray Rosas
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2013 to 2015 as part of PPRay.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Splash, Rosas Bomb, Double Superkick.
Brief description: As part of PPRay with Peter Avalon, Ray Rosas contributed to PWG’s tag team division with a mix of humor and strong in-ring work. Their entertaining antics and cohesive teamwork endeared them to the audience.

Ray Rowe
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2016 to 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse grappler with striking and suplex-heavy offense.
Signature moves: Death Rowe, Exploder Suplex, Spinebuster.
Brief description: As one half of War Machine (with Hanson), Ray Rowe showcased his brute strength and hard-hitting style. Their matches against top PWG teams like The Young Bucks left a lasting impression on the tag team division.

reDRagon (Kyle O'Reilly & Bobby Fish)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2013 to 2017.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Chasing the Dragon, Double Armbar, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: reDRagon was one of the most dominant and technically proficient teams in PWG’s history. Their seamless teamwork and ability to adapt to various styles made them a highlight of the tag team division.

Rey Fenix
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Main event as a singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre innovator.
Signature moves: Black Fire Driver, Tornillo Plancha, Rolling Cutter.
Brief description: Rey Fenix’s incredible agility and creative offense have made him a top performer in PWG. As part of the Lucha Brothers with Penta El Zero M, he delivered some of the promotion’s most memorable tag team matches.

Rey Horus
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Satellite DDT, Tornillo Plancha, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Rey Horus has been a key figure in PWG’s modern roster, delivering exciting and innovative matches that highlight his agility and lucha libre expertise. His performances in singles and multi-man bouts have been consistently praised.

Rich Swann
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2012 to 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced striker.
Signature moves: Standing 450 Splash, Lethal Injection, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Rich Swann became a fan favorite in PWG with his electrifying style and infectious charisma. His partnership with Ricochet as the Inner City Machine Guns was a highlight of the tag team division, delivering thrilling matches against top-tier teams.

Rick Knox
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to present as a referee.
Position on the card: Senior official.
Wrestling style: N/A.
Signature moves: Referee Interference, Jumping Clothesline (rare).
Brief description: Rick Knox is one of the most iconic referees in independent wrestling, often involved in comedic or dramatic moments during PWG matches. His contributions to the promotion’s storytelling and entertainment value have made him an integral part of PWG history.

Ricky Reyes
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: Submission-based technical grappler.
Signature moves: Dragon Sleeper, Leg Lariat, Fisherman’s Suplex.
Brief description: As part of the Havana Pitbulls with Rocky Romero, Ricky Reyes was a major player in PWG’s early tag team division. Their intense and technical matches helped elevate the promotion’s reputation for high-caliber wrestling.

Ricochet
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2010 to 2018.
Position on the card: Main event as a singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with innovative and fast-paced offense.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Benadryller, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Ricochet is one of PWG’s most celebrated performers, known for his breathtaking aerial maneuvers and match-of-the-year contenders. As part of teams like the Inner City Machine Guns and in singles competition, he became a cornerstone of PWG’s modern era.

Ringkampf (WALTER & Timothy Thatcher)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2017 and 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based wrestling with a strong focus on psychology.
Signature moves: Powerbomb/European Uppercut Combo, Sleeper Suplex, Double Submission.
Brief description: Ringkampf brought their no-nonsense, hard-hitting style to PWG, delivering intense and physical matches. Their emphasis on wrestling fundamentals and psychology made them a standout team during their appearances.

Rising Son
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with innovative aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Springboard Moonsault, 450 Splash, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Rising Son was part of PWG’s early roster, delivering exciting and fast-paced performances. His high-flying style and creative offense helped establish the foundation for PWG’s reputation as a showcase for diverse talent.

Robbie Eagles
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking hybrid.
Signature moves: Ron Miller Special, Turbo Backpack, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Robbie Eagles brought his dynamic offense and unique blend of high-flying and submission wrestling to PWG. His performances in singles and multi-man matches demonstrated his adaptability and skill.

RockNES Monsters (Johnny Goodtime & Johnny Yuma)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Tandem Neckbreaker, Assisted Moonsault.
Brief description: The RockNES Monsters added humor and excitement to PWG’s tag team division, showcasing their creativity and teamwork in memorable matches. Their lighthearted approach and innovative offense made them a fan-favorite duo.

Rey Horus
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Satellite DDT, Tornillo Plancha, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Rey Horus consistently delivers thrilling matches that highlight his incredible agility and lucha libre expertise. His performances in singles and multi-man bouts are staples of PWG's contemporary roster.

Rich Swann
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2012 to 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced striker.
Signature moves: Standing 450 Splash, Lethal Injection, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Rich Swann’s charisma and high-energy style made him a fan favorite. As part of the Inner City Machine Guns with Ricochet, he brought exciting and innovative offense to PWG’s tag team division.

Rick Knox
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to present as a referee.
Position on the card: Senior official.
Wrestling style: N/A.
Signature moves: Rare comedic interference spots, including a Clothesline or Dive.
Brief description: Rick Knox is an iconic PWG referee, known for his involvement in storytelling and comedic or dramatic moments during matches. His presence adds personality to PWG events, making him a beloved figure among fans.

Ricky Reyes
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: Submission-based technical grappler.
Signature moves: Dragon Sleeper, Leg Lariat, Fisherman’s Suplex.
Brief description: As part of the Havana Pitbulls, Reyes helped establish PWG’s early tag team division. His technical wrestling and intensity in matches stood out during the promotion’s formative years.

Ricochet
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2010 to 2018.
Position on the card: Main event as a singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with innovative and fast-paced offense.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Benadryller, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Ricochet is one of the defining stars of PWG, known for his spectacular aerial maneuvers and show-stealing matches. As part of the Inner City Machine Guns and in singles competition, he consistently delivered classic performances.

Ringkampf (WALTER & Timothy Thatcher)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2017 and 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Power-based technical grappling with strong psychology.
Signature moves: Sleeper Suplex, European Uppercut, Double Team Powerbomb.
Brief description: Ringkampf’s hard-hitting and methodical style brought a unique dynamic to PWG. Their emphasis on fundamentals and storytelling made their matches standout highlights.

Rising Son
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with innovative aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Springboard Moonsault, Tornado DDT, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Rising Son was a pioneer in PWG’s early years, showcasing creativity and athleticism that helped lay the foundation for the promotion’s style.

Robbie Eagles
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and submission hybrid.
Signature moves: Ron Miller Special, Turbo Backpack, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Robbie Eagles showcased his dynamic offense and hybrid style in PWG, delivering standout performances in singles and multi-man matches that emphasized his adaptability and technical expertise.

RockNES Monsters (Johnny Goodtime & Johnny Yuma)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Assisted Moonsault, Tandem Neckbreaker.
Brief description: The RockNES Monsters brought humor and innovation to PWG’s tag team division. Their creative offense and crowd-friendly antics made them a standout duo during their run.

Rocky Romero
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007, with sporadic appearances later.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: Submission-based technical grappler with lucha libre elements.
Signature moves: Diablo Armbar, Forever Clotheslines, Shiranui.
Brief description: As part of the Havana Pitbulls with Ricky Reyes, Rocky Romero was a cornerstone of PWG’s early tag team division. His technical expertise and dynamic performances made him a standout competitor during his tenure.

Roderick Strong
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with powerful strikes and backbreaker variations.
Signature moves: End of Heartache, Strong Hold, Death by Roderick.
Brief description: Known as the "Messiah of the Backbreaker," Roderick Strong is one of PWG’s most decorated competitors. A former PWG World Champion, his intense matches, particularly in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments, made him a defining figure in the promotion.

Ronin (Johnny Goodtime & Johnny Yuma)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2011 as part of the RockNES Monsters.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Tandem Moonsault, Assisted Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: As a precursor to their RockNES Monsters team, Ronin showcased strong teamwork and creativity. Their ability to entertain both with in-ring action and personality was a staple of their PWG appearances.

Royce Isaacs
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Double Arm DDT, Spinebuster, Lariat.
Brief description: Royce Isaacs brought his physicality and power to PWG, competing in singles and tag team matches. His performances showcased his strength and adaptability in the competitive PWG environment.

Ryan Taylor
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2009 to 2012.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking elements.
Signature moves: Taylor Made Driver, Spinning Elbow, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: Ryan Taylor contributed consistent performances during his PWG tenure, blending technical wrestling with hard-hitting strikes. His versatility allowed him to excel in both singles and tag team competition.

S.B.S. (Super Dragon, Excalibur & Disco Machine)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2006.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a faction.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical wrestling with comedic undertones.
Signature moves: Curb Stomp, Psycho Driver, Tandem Suplex.
Brief description: The S.B.S. (Sick Boys Stable) was a dominant faction in PWG’s early years. Combining Super Dragon’s brutality, Excalibur’s technical skill, and Disco Machine’s charisma, they left a significant mark on PWG’s tag and trios divisions.

Sal Thomaselli
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005 and 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Sitout Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Swinging Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Sal Thomaselli competed in PWG as part of tag teams, bringing his physical style to the promotion’s mid-card. His performances helped bolster the depth of PWG’s tag team division.

Sami Callihan
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2011 to 2013.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with high-impact and submission elements.
Signature moves: Stretch Muffler, Cactus Driver, Headlock Driver.
Brief description: Sami Callihan’s PWG run featured his intense and aggressive wrestling style. His hard-hitting matches and unique persona helped him stand out in PWG’s stacked roster during his tenure.

Sammy Guevara
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2018 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: 630 Senton, Spanish Fly, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Sammy Guevara brought his flashy and high-energy style to PWG, delivering memorable performances in singles and multi-man matches. His aerial expertise made him a standout during his appearances.

Samoa Joe
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2006.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Submission and power-based hybrid.
Signature moves: Muscle Buster, Coquina Clutch, STF.
Brief description: Samoa Joe was one of the pillars of PWG’s early years, delivering brutal and technically proficient matches. His intensity and presence made him a marquee attraction and a dominant force in the promotion.

Samuray del Sol (Kalisto)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2012 and 2013.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre specialist.
Signature moves: Salida del Sol, Springboard Corkscrew, Tornillo Plancha.
Brief description: Samuray del Sol brought his breathtaking aerial offense to PWG, showcasing his agility and innovative moves in thrilling matches. His performances highlighted his potential as a top-tier lucha talent.

Santana
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019 as part of LAX.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawler with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper, Powerbomb, Cannonball Senton.
Brief description: As one half of LAX with Ortiz, Santana brought intense and dynamic performances to PWG’s tag team division. Their matches against top teams like The Young Bucks were a highlight of PWG’s events during their tenure.

Sara Del Rey
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2005 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking elements.
Signature moves: Royal Butterfly, Piledriver, Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: Sara Del Rey was one of the most prominent female competitors in PWG’s history, showcasing her technical and striking skills in mixed-gender matches. Her performances helped pave the way for women in independent wrestling.

Scorpio Sky
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Ace of Spades, TKO, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Scorpio Sky was a key figure in PWG’s early years and continued to deliver strong performances throughout his tenure. Known for his athleticism and charisma, he was a fan favorite in both singles and tag team action.

Scott Lost
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking hybrid.
Signature moves: Big Fat Kill, Sharpshooter, Superkick.
Brief description: As one of PWG’s founders and a member of The Dynasty with Joey Ryan, Scott Lost was instrumental in shaping the promotion’s early years. His mix of technical prowess and character work made him a standout performer in both singles and tag team matches.

Sexxxy Eddy
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic and hardcore elements.
Signature moves: Sexy Plex, Moonsault, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Sexxxy Eddy brought his eccentric and entertaining persona to PWG, combining comedic antics with high-risk wrestling. His performances added a unique flavor to PWG’s early years.

Shane Ballard
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2003 and 2004.
Position on the card: Mid-card as part of the Ballard Brothers.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling and tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Flapjack, Assisted Suplex, Backbreaker Variations.
Brief description: As one half of the Ballard Brothers, Shane Ballard contributed to PWG’s tag team division with solid technical matches. Their cohesive teamwork and classic style added variety to the early PWG cards.

Shane Haste (Shane Thorne)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2011 to 2013.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Bomb Valley Death, Suicide Dive, Springboard Elbow Drop.
Brief description: As part of TMDK (The Mighty Don’t Kneel) with Mikey Nicholls, Shane Haste showcased his athleticism and innovative offense in PWG’s tag team division. Their chemistry and exciting matches made them a standout duo.

Shane Matthews (Matt Lee)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2011 to 2013 as part of 3.0.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedic grappler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Sweet Taste of Professionalism, Assisted Suplex, Double Clothesline.
Brief description: As one half of 3.0 (with Jeff Parker), Shane Matthews brought humor and energy to PWG’s tag team division. Their comedic antics and entertaining matches made them fan favorites during their tenure.

Shane Strickland (Swerve Strickland)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking hybrid.
Signature moves: Swerve Stomp, House Call, Rolling Flatliner.
Brief description: Shane Strickland brought his dynamic and innovative style to PWG, competing in singles and multi-man matches. His charisma and adaptability in the ring made him a standout performer in the promotion’s modern era.

Shannon Ballard
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005 as part of the Ballard Brothers.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: Technical grappling with tag team expertise.
Signature moves: Assisted Suplex, Flapjack, Backbreaker Variations.
Brief description: Shannon Ballard, as one half of the Ballard Brothers, contributed to PWG’s tag team division with a classic tag team wrestling style. Their chemistry and teamwork helped establish PWG’s foundation.

SHINGO (Shingo Takagi)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2007 and 2008.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Made in Japan, Last Falconry, Pumping Bomber.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, SHINGO delivered hard-hitting and intense performances in PWG. His matches showcased his explosive offense and cemented his reputation as a top-tier international talent.

Sonjay Dutt
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2004 and 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Hindu Press, Standing Shooting Star Press, Camel Clutch.
Brief description: Sonjay Dutt brought his exciting aerial offense to PWG, competing in fast-paced singles and multi-man matches. His innovative style made him a standout in PWG’s early years.

Spanky (Brian Kendrick)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2004 to 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Sliced Bread #2, Frog Splash, Reverse Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Spanky was a consistent performer in PWG, delivering high-energy matches that showcased his blend of charisma and technical ability. His presence added star power to PWG’s early cards.

Spiked Mohicans (Matt Sydal & Ricochet)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying tag team wrestling with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Tandem Moonsault, Double Rotation Splash, Assisted Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: The pairing of Sydal and Ricochet as Spiked Mohicans brought excitement to PWG’s tag division, delivering fast-paced and creative matches that highlighted their aerial prowess and chemistry.

Stalker Ichikawa
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily comedic.
Wrestling style: Comedic grappler with technical and exaggerated antics.
Signature moves: Roll-Up Variations, Eye Poke, Satirical Moves.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, Stalker Ichikawa provided comic relief with his over-the-top persona and humorous matches. His appearances brought a unique and entertaining dynamic to PWG.

Stu Grayson (Player Uno)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2010 as part of the Super Smash Brothers.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based hybrid.
Signature moves: Fatality, Moonsault, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Stu Grayson, as part of the Super Smash Brothers, brought an exciting blend of agility and strength to PWG’s tag team division. Their innovative offense and charismatic presence made them a fan-favorite duo during their tenure.

Stupefied (Player Dos)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2010 as part of the Super Smash Brothers.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card as a tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Fatality, 450 Splash, Springboard DDT.
Brief description: As one half of the Super Smash Brothers, Stupefied added agility and creativity to PWG’s tag team division. His performances were consistently entertaining and showcased his aerial expertise.

Super Crazy
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2005 and 2006.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Moonsault Trio, Tornillo, Running Powerbomb.
Brief description: Super Crazy brought his lucha libre expertise to PWG, delivering thrilling and fast-paced matches. His international acclaim and exciting offense made him a standout during his appearances.

Super Dragon
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2016.
Position on the card: Main eventer as a singles and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Psycho Driver, Curb Stomp, Barry White Driver.
Brief description: Super Dragon is one of the founding members of PWG and a key figure in the promotion’s identity. Known for his intense and brutal in-ring style, he has competed in some of PWG’s most memorable matches and rivalries, solidifying his legacy as a cornerstone of the promotion.

Super Smash Brothers (Player Uno & Player Dos)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Fatality, Assisted Springboard Moonsault, Double Stomp/Suplex Combo.
Brief description: The Super Smash Brothers were one of PWG’s most creative and entertaining tag teams. Their unique offense, strong teamwork, and charismatic performances left a lasting impression on PWG’s tag team division.

SuperKliq (Adam Cole & The Young Bucks)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to 2017 as a faction.
Position on the card: Main event as a trio.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking with comedic and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Double Superkick, Panama Sunrise/Meltzer Driver Combo, Triple Tombstone.
Brief description: SuperKliq dominated PWG with their dynamic offense and charismatic heel antics. Their matches combined high-caliber wrestling with over-the-top entertainment, solidifying their status as one of PWG’s most popular factions.

Susumu Yokosuka
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking hybrid with power elements.
Signature moves: Jumbo no Kachi, Mugen, Yokosuka Cutter.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, Susumu Yokosuka brought his hard-hitting and technical style to PWG. His performances in multi-man matches were highlights of the cards, showcasing his versatility and international appeal.

T-Hawk
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based striking with technical elements.
Signature moves: Night Ride, BT Bomb, Running Lariat.
Brief description: Representing OWE (Oriental Wrestling Entertainment), T-Hawk delivered intense and physical performances in PWG. His unique blend of power and precision made him a notable addition to the roster during his appearances.

Taiji Ishimori
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2016 and 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Bloody Cross, Moonsault.
Brief description: Taiji Ishimori showcased his dynamic and explosive style in PWG, competing in singles and multi-man matches that highlighted his agility and precision. His international experience brought an exciting flair to PWG events.

TARO
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2005.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking and comedic elements.
Signature moves: TARO Clutch, Shining Wizard, Moonsault.
Brief description: TARO was an early PWG mainstay, known for his blend of humor and technical wrestling. His matches helped establish PWG’s reputation for showcasing a wide range of wrestling styles.

Team F.I.S.T. (Icarus & Chuck Taylor)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic hybrid.
Signature moves: Sole Food, Tandem Suplex, Double Knee Strike.
Brief description: Representing CHIKARA, Team F.I.S.T. brought their entertaining and technically sound wrestling style to PWG. Their combination of comedy and skill made them a standout during their limited appearances.

Team Tremendous (Dan Barry & Bill Carr)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic hybrid tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Doomsday Sliced Bread, Assisted Piledriver, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Team Tremendous brought their detective-inspired gimmick and entertaining dynamic to PWG, delivering fun and engaging matches. Their blend of comedy and cohesive teamwork made them crowd favorites during their appearances.

Timothy Thatcher
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2014 to 2017.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Submission and technical grappler with a focus on physicality.
Signature moves: Fujiwara Armbar, European Uppercut, Butterfly Suplex.
Brief description: Timothy Thatcher was a dominant force in PWG, known for his intense and hard-hitting style. As part of Ringkampf with WALTER, Thatcher showcased his exceptional technical wrestling and storytelling in both singles and tag team matches.

TJ Perkins (Pinoy Boy/Puma)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2008.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: Detonation Kick, 450 Splash, Figure Four Deathlock.
Brief description: TJ Perkins, competing as both Pinoy Boy and Puma, was a key figure in PWG’s early years. His blend of technical prowess and lucha libre-inspired aerial offense made him a standout performer in singles and multi-man matches.

Tommaso Ciampa
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2014 to 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Project Ciampa, Willow’s Bell, Bridging Fujiwara Armbar.
Brief description: Tommaso Ciampa’s PWG run featured intense and hard-hitting matches, showcasing his aggressive style and captivating character work. His performances in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and singles bouts made him a fan favorite.

Tommy End (Malakai Black)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2015 and 2016.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Striking specialist with submission elements.
Signature moves: Black Mass, Brainbuster, Dragon Sleeper.
Brief description: Before gaining international acclaim, Tommy End competed in PWG, impressing audiences with his lethal striking and dark persona. His matches against top-tier talent were highlights of the events he participated in.

Tony Deppen
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-energy technical grappler with striking elements.
Signature moves: Running Knee Strike, Bridging German Suplex, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Tony Deppen brought his intense and versatile style to PWG, delivering standout performances in singles and multi-man matches. His adaptability and charisma made him a notable addition to the promotion’s modern roster.

Top Gun Talwar
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Talwar Driver, Double Arm DDT, Lariat.
Brief description: Top Gun Talwar was a prominent figure in PWG’s early years, contributing both as a comedic personality and a reliable in-ring performer. As part of HookGun with Hook Bomberry, he brought humor and solid wrestling to PWG’s tag team division.

Trent (Trent Beretta)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a singles competitor and in tag team action.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking hybrid.
Signature moves: Crunchy, Tornado DDT, Dudebuster.
Brief description: Trent has been a consistent performer in PWG, delivering standout matches both as a singles competitor and in tag team bouts, particularly with Chuck Taylor as Best Friends. His blend of humor and athleticism has made him a fan favorite.

Trevor Lee (Cameron Grimes)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2014 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with striking and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Cave-In, Small Package Driver, Deadlift German Suplex.
Brief description: Trevor Lee rose to prominence in PWG with his intense matches and character work. Known for his humorous promos and in-ring versatility, he became one of PWG’s most reliable performers, competing in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and main-event bouts.

Trey Miguel
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Meteora, Electric Chair Driver, Diving Moonsault.
Brief description: As a member of The Rascalz, Trey Miguel showcased his fast-paced and innovative offense in PWG’s tag team and multi-man matches. His performances demonstrated his potential as one of the top high-flyers on the independent scene.

Tyler Bateman
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Death from Above, Arm-Trap Piledriver, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: Tyler Bateman brought a unique intensity to PWG, delivering physical matches that highlighted his technical and striking abilities. His dark persona added depth to his performances in singles and multi-man contests.

Tyler Black (Seth Rollins)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2008 to 2010.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid with striking elements.
Signature moves: God’s Last Gift, Phoenix Splash, Buckle Bomb.
Brief description: Tyler Black made a significant impact during his time in PWG, delivering high-energy performances against top-tier opponents. His matches in the Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and his eventual transition to a main-event role solidified his place as one of PWG’s top stars.

Uhaa Nation (Apollo Crews)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2014 and 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with incredible agility.
Signature moves: Uhaa Combination (Standing Moonsault/Shooting Star Press), Gorilla Press Slam, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Uhaa Nation wowed PWG audiences with his mix of strength and athleticism. His ability to perform feats of agility at his size made his matches a must-see during his tenure.

Unbreakable F'N Machines (Brian Cage & Michael Elgin)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2014 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Power-based tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Double Suplex, Tandem Lariats.
Brief description: The Unbreakable F'N Machines dominated PWG’s tag team division with their brute strength and impressive coordination. Their battles against top-tier teams highlighted their raw power and synergy.

Violence Unlimited (Brody King & Tyler Bateman)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Gonzo Bomb, Assisted Piledriver, Tandem Lariat.
Brief description: Violence Unlimited brought a vicious and intense style to PWG, delivering physical and brutal matches. Their chemistry and aggressive offense made them a notable team during their tenure.

WALTER
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based striker with technical elements.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Powerbomb, Devastating Chops.
Brief description: WALTER became a dominant force in PWG, delivering hard-hitting matches that showcased his striking ability and physical presence. His performances in singles competition and as part of Ringkampf with Timothy Thatcher were widely acclaimed.

War Machine (Hanson & Ray Rowe)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2016 and 2017.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Power-based and high-impact tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Fallout, Assisted German Suplex, Tandem Powerbomb.
Brief description: War Machine brought their imposing presence and powerful offense to PWG, engaging in thrilling battles with teams like The Young Bucks. Their combination of strength and agility made them a standout in the tag team division.

West Coast Wrecking Crew (Royce Isaacs & Jorel Nelson)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Power-based tag team wrestling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Double Suplex, Tandem Lariat.
Brief description: The West Coast Wrecking Crew showcased their strength and cohesion in PWG, delivering hard-hitting and well-coordinated performances in tag team matches. Their chemistry and aggressive style made them a valuable addition to PWG’s modern roster.

Wheeler Yuta
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances starting in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with high-energy transitions and submissions.
Signature moves: Seatbelt Clutch, Bridging German Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Wheeler Yuta brought his sharp technical skills and versatility to PWG, competing in singles and multi-man matches. His ability to adapt to a variety of opponents made him a standout performer during his appearances.

Will Ospreay
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances from 2016 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid with striking elements.
Signature moves: Oscutter, Hidden Blade, Storm Breaker.
Brief description: Will Ospreay electrified PWG audiences with his incredible aerial offense and innovative style. His matches against top-tier talent in Battle of Los Angeles tournaments and main events were widely acclaimed.

Willie Mack
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2010 to 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawler with surprising agility.
Signature moves: Chocolate Thunder Bomb, Stunner, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Willie Mack became a fan favorite in PWG due to his charismatic personality and unique in-ring style. His ability to mix power and high-flying moves made his matches a highlight of PWG events.

World's Cutest Tag Team (Candice LeRae & Joey Ryan)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2013 to 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic hybrid tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Superkick, Ball Plex, Moonsault.
Brief description: The World's Cutest Tag Team was one of PWG’s most beloved duos, known for their creative offense and storytelling. Their rivalry with The Young Bucks and victory in the PWG World Tag Team Championship solidified their place in PWG history.

X-Foundation (Scott Lost & Joey Ryan)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2007.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card as a tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking hybrid tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Superkick, Sharpshooter.
Brief description: The X-Foundation was one of PWG’s earliest standout tag teams. Their mix of technical expertise and cohesive teamwork made them integral to PWG’s tag team division during the promotion’s formative years.

YAMATO
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Sporadic appearances in 2007 and 2008.
Position on the card: Mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based technical grappler with striking elements.
Signature moves: Galleria, Choke Sleeper, Brainbuster.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, YAMATO showcased his technical and hard-hitting style in PWG. His performances in multi-man and singles matches highlighted his versatility and international experience.

Young Bucks (Matt Jackson & Nick Jackson)
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2007 to present.
Position on the card: Main event as a tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking hybrid tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck, Meltzer Driver, Superkick Party.
Brief description: The Young Bucks are one of the most iconic teams in PWG history, known for their innovative offense, charisma, and legendary rivalries with teams like The Lucha Brothers and The World's Cutest Tag Team. Multiple-time PWG World Tag Team Champions, they have defined PWG’s modern tag team division.

Zachary Wentz
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2017 to 2019 as part of The Rascalz.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Hot Fire Flame, Standing Moonsault, Assisted Cutter.
Brief description: As a member of The Rascalz, Zachary Wentz brought his explosive and creative style to PWG’s tag team division. His chemistry with Trey Miguel and Dezmond Xavier helped produce some of PWG’s most exciting tag and trios matches.

Zack Sabre Jr.
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2015 to present.
Position on the card: Main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission specialist.
Signature moves: Zack Driver, Orienteering with Napalm Death, Octopus Stretch.
Brief description: Zack Sabre Jr. is one of PWG’s most accomplished competitors, known for his unparalleled technical prowess and ability to adapt to any opponent. A former PWG World Champion, his matches have been hailed as masterpieces of technical wrestling.

Zokre
Time in Pro Wrestling Guerrilla: Regular from 2003 to 2006 as part of Los Luchas.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team action.
Wrestling style: Traditional lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Arm Drag, Moonsault, Tornillo Plancha.
Brief description: As one half of Los Luchas with Phoenix Star, Zokre was a key figure in PWG’s early tag team division. Their fast-paced and innovative offense brought an exciting lucha libre style to PWG audiences.
